Vaccinating 5- to 11-year-olds could be a big step toward returning to normal life in the U.S., but even parents who got the shot are worried about how it might affect their kids.

The Food and Drug Administration’s authorization of a Covid-19 vaccine for ages 5 to 11 on Friday makes 28 million unvaccinated children in the United States suddenly eligible for the shot and offers the country an opportunity to make big inroads in its efforts to achieve broad immunity against the coronavirus.

But in a nation that has already struggled mightily with Covid vaccine hesitancy, getting shots into those little arms may present health authorities with the toughest vaccination challenge yet.

Even many parents who are themselves vaccinated and approved the shot for their teenagers are churning over whether to give consent for their younger children, questioning if the risk of the unknowns of a brand-new vaccine is worth it when most coronavirus cases in youngsters are mild.

In announcing its authorization of a lower-dose shot made by Pfizer and BioNTech for the age group, the F.D.A. said clinical trial data showed the shot was safe and prompted strong immune responses in children. The most common side effects were fatigue, fever and headache.

Infectious disease experts say that with approaching holiday travel and family gatherings, widespread vaccination of younger children could be a game-changer: It could help keep classes in person, reduce the likelihood of quarantines and lessen the risk of transmission to older, vulnerable adults — as well as protect the children from what has become the eighth biggest killer in their age group, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. To date, nearly two million children age 5 to 11 have been infected with the virus and 8,300 have been hospitalized. A third of those hospitalized were admitted to intensive care units, and at least 170 have died.

But a report this month from researchers at Northeastern, Harvard, Rutgers and Northwestern universities found that parental concerns around the Covid vaccination had increased “significantly” from June through September. Chief among them, researchers said, were the newness of the vaccine, whether it has been sufficiently tested, efficacy, side effects and long-term health consequences.

According to a survey released Thursday by Kaiser Family Foundation, scarcely one in three parents will permit their children in this newly eligible age group to be vaccinated immediately. Two-thirds were either reluctant or adamantly opposed. An Axios-Ipsos poll found that 42 percent of parents of these children said they were unlikely to have their children vaccinated.

Erin Gauch, of Middletown, R.I., got herself and her two older children, ages 14 and 12, vaccinated this summer. But she’s worried about the potential side effects of the shots for her son. One of those side effects is myocarditis, which can cause a weakening of the heart muscle, that has been reported in a very small number of teenage boys and young men after getting a Covid shot.

“I’m looking at a 9-year-old and if I make a bad decision and he ends up with some debilitating side effects or lifelong adverse reaction, I don’t think I could live with that,” she said.

This vaccine dilemma occurs at a turbulent cultural moment for parents of young children, who are often judged harshly on social media for their decisions. The choice can appear freighted with political affiliation. A decision can signify, intentionally or not, compassion or disregard for others and a willingness to follow or ignore advice from their pediatrician.

“If we ultimately decide not to get my youngest vaccinated right now, I guess I’ll be subjected to mommy shaming but I’ll just have to deal with it,” Ms. Gauch said.

Many parents, like Ms. Gauch, are focusing on some research that suggests the rare possibility that young men and boys will develop myocarditis, but the clinical trial data the F.D.A. reviewedshowed no cases in the 5 to 11 age group. Many experts say that the conditions usually improve quickly and that Covid presents far greater risk of severe myocarditis.

The Biden administration recently announced that the shots would be given predominantly by pediatricians, community health centers and children’s hospitals, plus pharmacies and schools, which will carry the burden of persuading parents.

But a Kaiser policy brief noted that schools and pharmacists in regions where Covid vaccination rates are low may be reluctant to participate. Access in rural areas and for working parents will be considerable challenges, the authors said, and they noted that achieving equity will also be a concern: More than half of those newly eligible are children of color.

After what is expected to be an initial rush of eager parents (as happened with adults and teenagers), pediatricians say they are bracing for conversations they anticipate to be among the thorniest they have ever had.

“I know parents are probably bombarded with misinformation about vaccines, even within their social circles: ‘My friend said this, my mother-in-law said that,’” said Dr. Katherine Williamson, a pediatrician in Orange County, Calif. “I’m hoping I can make a difference.”

The decision is particularly hard for parents to make on behalf of their first child, said Emily Brunson, a medical anthropologist at Texas State University who researches parent vaccination choices. Because vaccine decision-making is so personal and complicated, she said, many parents are likely to put it off.

Vic Sandrin, who works for a bicycle company in Vancouver, Wash., supports vaccines but cautiously. He, his wife and their 18-year-old got the Covid vaccine grudgingly, to travel for work and family visits.

For his 11-year-old twins, however, he is content to wait: “I’m willing to take a chance on myself, and that made sense, I’m an adult,” Mr. Sandrin said. “But for kids who already have strong immune systems, I don’t know if there’s a reason to get them vaccinated, or at least not just quite yet. ”

At heart, the decision is about which unknown — Covid or the vaccine — parents fear more. They may stack factors such as social routines, older relatives, school protocols and the likelihood of severe illness to confirm their intuitive bias about whether to allow their child to get the shot.

Ms. Gauch, a mechanical engineer, calculated each family member’s risk individually. She has asthma, so, for her, the vaccine was a no-brainer. Her 14-year-old daughter got her first job this summer; getting vaccinated meant she wouldn’t have to wear a face mask at work. And her 12-year-old daughter saw that getting vaccinated could open up possibilities of being maskless in public. Done and done.

But not only does Ms. Gauch worry about side effects in her 9-year-old son, she says that getting vaccinated won’t release him from following other Covid rules because his school insists on masks and social distancing. “He is much less likely to get Covid if they’re taking all these precautions,” she said. “So I just don’t see the risk payoff of the vaccine.”

Parents who were predisposed not to vaccinate their child tended to dismiss the threat of serious illness from Covid as minuscule, saying that children who became seriously ill most likely had underlying conditions.

The argument that vaccinating children contributes to the community’s overall health does not get much traction, either. Parents’ paramount focus is the well-being of their own child. Although health officials contend an important reason to vaccinate is to protect the child, some parents said they believed that their healthy children would be injected with a novel vaccine largely to safeguard older adults, who had already lived full lives.

In interviews, some parents said that if the vaccine gained full approval for children (as the adult dose has) and schools required it, they would consider withdrawing their students. Dr. Cynthia Bader, a pediatrician in the Seattle area with an 8-year-old son, said that if her school district issued a vaccine mandate, she would clap her hands with joy but “then cringe at the idea of all the parents who will be coming to me seeking counseling for vaccine exemption forms.”

Parents are siloing themselves with like-minded friends, which reinforces their thinking. “It used to be that more people with different opinions would mesh, but now I don’t think that is the case,” said Abby Cooper of Bergen County, N.J., who is eager to get her five children vaccinated.

But she has friends who refuse. “Their kids are going to school with my kids and putting them at risk for no reason. It’s very upsetting. So, sadly, I’ve lost friends over this.”

Many parents worry that the tension will infect the children themselves. Some foresee having to set boundaries about unvaccinated playmates, especially if exposure to the virus could jeopardize someone else in the home.

Many parents will be difficult to persuade. The C.D.C. and the American Academy of Pediatrics have published talking points for pediatricians and other proponents of the Covid vaccine for children.

Consensus: First, address the parents’ questions. But if they don’t want to hear The Talk, don’t force it.

Consensus: Fear tactics — generalized descriptions of children suffering in Covid wards — don’t work.

Consensus: Emphasize the benefits of the Covid vaccine to the child in terms of emotional and physical well-being, including some semblance of pre-Covid social life. Invoke quarantines, remote learning.

Kim Cobb hopes that her family’s Covid ordeals will show others the benefits of vaccinating all eligible family members. She, her husband and their two older daughters, 14 and 12, got vaccinated quickly. But in August, her unvaccinated 10-year-old twins came down with Covid. Soon after, Dr. Cobb, a climate scientist at Georgia Tech, and her husband tested positive for breakthrough infections. Their two vaccinated children remained healthy.

The parents became miserably ill but did not require hospitalization, which they believe is because they were vaccinated.

All recovered, but Dr. Cobb and one twin have lingering respiratory distress.

“We’re in the third month post-infection and we have to see pulmonologists, we have inhalers, we’re on medication and we’re still having breathing difficulties,” Dr. Cobb said. “And this is not a kid who ever had respiratory symptoms.”

“It was not foreseeable,” she continued. “If you could avoid it, you would.”

President Biden has said the government should help people who continue to experience symptoms long after a coronavirus infection. But qualifying remains a major hurdle.

Since she tested positive for the coronavirus in April 2020, Josie Cabrera Taveras has found herself sleeping for up to 15 hours a day, stopping in grocery store aisles to catch her breath, lapsing in and out of consciousness and unable to return to her job as a nanny.

She believes that she is one of thousands, possibly millions, of Americans who may have a condition known as “long Covid.” The Biden administration has said people with the condition could qualify for federal disability protections and benefits, which can include health care, housing and unemployment benefits.

But like many others who may have long Covid, Ms. Taveras, 31, has had a hard time proving it.

Two brain M.R.I.s, several heart ultrasounds, dozens of lung X-rays, two stomach endoscopies, one colonoscopy and multiple CT scans have all provided the same results: Everything looks normal. “It’s something doctors can’t explain yet, what’s happening to me,” Ms. Taveras said.

With no direct medical evidence of her condition, she has been turned down for disability coverage twice. Even a note from a prestigious post-Covid clinic in the Mount Sinai hospital system, attesting that Ms. Taveras “continues to experience daily symptoms and is currently unable to work,” was not enough.

In July, at a White House event celebrating the Americans with Disabilities Act, President Biden promised “to make sure Americans with long Covid who have a disability have access to the rights and resources that are due under the disability law.”

But with no widely agreed-on method of diagnosing the ailment, those who believe they have long Covid are finding it difficult to qualify under a system that is unfamiliar and already tricky to navigate.

Studies have shown that a significant number of Covid-19 patients continue to seek treatment for a wide range of medical conditions many months after a diagnosis. The American Academy of Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation estimates that three million to 10 million Americans may have long Covid.

Yet many of those seeking benefits cannot produce a positive coronavirus test because tests were in short supply at the beginning of the pandemic. And lab results and scans often show nothing unusual for those continuing to experience symptoms.

“I expect the tests to come back normal,” said Dr. Luis Tatem, an infectious-disease specialist who has been treating Ms. Taveras and other long Covid patients at the University Hospital of Brooklyn. He added: “We’re used to having a laboratory to back us up. And for this, you don’t.”

Since December 2020, the Social Security Administration has determined that about 16,000 applicants were able to provide medical evidence supporting Covid-19 as one of their impairments, according to Nicole Tiggemann, a spokeswoman for the agency, which was not flagging Covid cases before that.

But she would not say how many of those 16,000 applicants had been approved for benefits, or how many people claiming long Covid as a condition had been denied. Many cases are probably still pending; wait times for a determination can stretch for five months or more.

The pandemic forced the Social Security Administration to largely shut down in-person services, and some experts predict a flood of applicants with long Covid in the coming year, adding to the strained agency’s workload.

“Addressing the disability backlog is one of our top priorities,” Ms. Tiggemann said via email, acknowledging that the pandemic had increased wait times. Mr. Biden has called for an additional $1.3 billion for the agency’s budget for the 2022 fiscal year, but his proposal is part of the current negotiations in Congress, and it is unclear whether it will pass.

About 8.1 million disabled workers and 1.4 million of their family members receive disability benefits, which average about $1,280 a month. To qualify, applicants must demonstrate a disability that substantially limits their ability to work and has lasted, or will last, for at least a year. Typically, the Social Security Administration uses medical assessments or health records to determine whether someone qualifies, and a vast majority of those approved for disability stay on it for life.

Getting approved can be difficult. Between 2009 and 2018, the Social Security Administration denied 66 percent of applications on average.

But some people with long Covid symptoms have had success — even without a positive coronavirus test — if they are able to demonstrate a substantial downturn in their health and ability to work.

Steven Trompeter, 49, was unable to perform his job as an industrial mechanic after getting sick with Covid symptoms, including cough, fever, muscle aches and loss of taste and smell, in February 2020. He applied for disability in December 2020 and was approved six months later.

Mr. Trompeter, a Navy veteran who lives in Idaho Falls, Idaho, said he believed that the extensive medical records documenting his past health and his repeated visits to a Veterans Affairs medical clinic in 2020 helped show how sick he had become, with ongoing “brain fog” and other difficulties.

“I’ve heard nightmares where you have to get denied three times and then get a lawyer to go before a judge, and I didn’t have to do any of that,” he said. “I just had to wait.”

Ms. Tiggemann said a determination of whether people qualify for benefits has more to do with how their symptoms affect their ability to function than the exact diagnosis. So a positive Covid test, while helpful, might not be necessary if the other evidence clearly shows an inability to work, she said.

“No two cases are the same, each case is individual,” she said. “We look at doctor’s tests, medical records, past treatments and whether they have other conditions.”

Long Covid has proved similar to other diseases that can be difficult to diagnose, including myalgic encephalomyelitis (also known as chronic fatigue syndrome), fibromyalgia, rheumatoid arthritis and post-treatment Lyme disease syndrome — conditions that can also cause fatigue, memory issues and joint pain.

Patients with these diseases often find it difficult to qualify for disability benefits and get accurate, timely medical diagnoses. Studies from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and organizations that represent people with those conditions have shown that some patients can spend years or even more than a decade trying to determine what causes their illnesses.

Many medical schools do not offer enough training on these types of diseases, and research for them is underfunded, said Linda Tannenbaum, chief executive of the Open Medicine Foundation, a nonprofit that funds research into chronic complex diseases like fibromyalgia and long Covid. “Most patients cannot get disability benefits,” she said.

Dr. Stephen Martin, a physician and professor at the University of Massachusetts Medical School, said the complex nature of diagnosing long Covid required the coordination of various specialists who also have specific knowledge of the condition. Many are overbooked, he said, with wait lists of more than six months — especially for patients who do not have good health insurance.

“This really hits us in our Achilles’ heel of health care,” Dr. Martin said. “The American health care system really isn’t set up to do this at scale.”

Sandee Babb, 54, of Grand Rapids, Mich., has seen nearly two dozen doctors over the past year trying to figure out what is causing a range of symptoms, including cardiac arrhythmia, a chronic cough, shortness of breath and joint pain, which have kept her from returning to her job as a teacher and librarian. She says she gets breathless just trying to put her socks on, and cannot walk up a flight of stairs without stopping to rest.

“The brain fog is crazy bad,” Ms. Babb said. “I’ve been in the shower and stared at my shampoo bottle and couldn’t figure out how to open it.”

She could not get a coronavirus test when she first got sick in March 2020, early in the pandemic. But a September progress note from her doctor said her symptoms “could be consistent with long-haul type syndrome.”

Since getting sick, Ms. Babb has lost her home and all of her retirement savings. She is working as a live-in caretaker for a quadriplegic friend in part to keep a roof over her head.

After months documenting her condition, she submitted her unemployment application in August and is not sure when she will get an answer. “If it doesn’t come through, then I’m really stuck,” she said. “Where do I go from here?”


Vaccines to protect young children from Covid-19 are most likely soon on their way. An advisory panel for the Food and Drug Administration voted overwhelmingly on Tuesday to recommend that the agency authorize the use of the Pfizer-BioNTech Covid-19 vaccine for those ages 5 to 11.

Why do we need to vaccinate young children against Covid-19? It's an understandable question. While many parents have anxiously awaited the opportunity to get their children vaccinated, others are hesitant. There are questions about side effects, as with any drug, especially considering the lower risk of severe disease for children with Covid-19 compared with that of adults.

But just because Covid-19 is sickening and killing fewer children than adults does not mean that children are or have been free from risk.

In the United States, more than six million children have been infected with SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes Covid-19, and more than 23,500 were hospitalized from it. Over 600 children ages 18 and under have died from the disease, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

That's in large part because the coronavirus has spread so widely in the United States. Vaccine uptake among American adults has been lower than desired; combined with the highly contagious Delta variant and a decrease in mitigation measures like mask wearing in many parts of the country, it has taken a toll.

Some experts even suggest that the pandemic may not end without a child vaccine campaign: Vaccinating children will help slow the spread of the disease to the unvaccinated and to more at-risk adults, reducing its toll on everyone.

There is simply not an acceptable number of child deaths when such effective and safe preventive treatments are available. So, for the same reason pediatricians recommend seatbelts and car seats, the American Academy of Pediatrics is recommending vaccines for Covid-19.

Parents should feel assured that when the vaccines are authorized for children, it means they are considered extremely effective and side effects are rare. The question I am most often asked is about the risk of myocarditis after the vaccine. Myocarditis is an inflammation of the muscle of the heart which can occur from many different causes and can range in severity. It occurs very rarely after getting an mRNA Covid-19 vaccine (like the ones made by Moderna and Pfizer) and is more common after the second shot and in young men.

When I chose to vaccinate my teenage son, there were two things that were important to my decision-making. First, the risk of developing myocarditis after a Covid-19 infection is much higher than the risk of developing myocarditis after the vaccine. Second, almost all the cases of myocarditis after the vaccine are mild, and people generally get better quickly. Vaccinating my children was an easy choice knowing that the risk of Covid-19 to children is far greater than the risk of the vaccines.

The expanded availability of vaccines should bring peace of mind to many families of elementary-school-age students that their children are safer in classrooms and activities outside of school, and that they are doing their part to expedite a full return to routines and activities.

Studies show that layers of protection -- including improving ventilation and wearing masks -- have effectively stopped or slowed the Covid-19 virus from spreading in camps and schools that consistently enforced these measures. While these continue to be important precautions to help keep young children safe, vaccination is the most effective layer there is, and the sooner it can be safely available to all children, the better.

The pandemic has also deepened an existing mental health crisis among young people. Over 140,000 American children have lost a caregiver to Covid-19. Pediatricians across the United States have seen a rise in young patients with eating disorders, depression and suicidal thoughts. That's why the American Academy of Pediatrics and other children's groups recently declared a national state of emergency for children's mental health. Educational gaps are also widening, with reports suggesting American students are behind in math and reading. These consequences are all magnified for low-income families and families of color.

While no response to Covid-19 has been perfect, other countries tried to prioritize schools in ways the United States largely did not, and put in place precautions that would allow children to be safer, like masks and testing.

More than 18 months later, the United States still lags in adult immunization rates and access to rapid at-home tests compared with many other countries -- both of which can support a safer return to school and activities. But the Covid-19 vaccine offers a tangible opportunity for children to return to a more normal daily life.

Parents and other family members can also protect their children by getting vaccinated themselves. If you haven't gotten a vaccine yet, please do so as soon as you can.

The impact of the pandemic on this generation, I fear, will be deep and long lasting unless policymakers act now and invest in children and families. Even though a Covid-19 vaccine is coming for young children, there's still work to do. Some children will need more intensive help to overcome the challenges they encountered during the pandemic. Communities and schools that have been historically underresourced will need even greater investment.

Children are resilient, but they need stability, hope and confidence in the adults who care for them. While the brutal toll of the pandemic will reverberate for years to come, let's make the choice to finally put children first.

Covid cases have been falling in every region of the U.S., offering hope.

It is time for one of The Morning’s occasional updates on the state of the pandemic. Today’s is focused on the U.S. and organized around three main points.

1. Covid’s retreat continues

The number of new daily Covid-19 cases has plunged 57 percent since peaking on Sept. 1. Almost as encouraging as the magnitude of the decline is its breadth: Cases have been declining in every region.

Forecasting Covid’s future is extremely difficult, as we all should know by now, and it’s certainly possible that cases will rise again in the coming weeks. But the geographic breadth of the decline does offer reason for optimism.

Past Covid increases have generally started in one part of the country — like the South this past summer or the New York region in early 2020 — and then gone national. Today, there is no regional surge that seems to have the makings of a nationwide surge.

Yes, there are some local hot spots, as has almost always been the case since the pandemic began. (You can look up your county.) Several of the hot spots are in northern parts of the country, like Alaska, Idaho, Montana, North Dakota and a few counties near the Canadian border in New Hampshire and Vermont. This pattern has led to some speculation that the onset of cold weather is causing the increases by moving more activity indoors — and that the entire country will soon experience a rise in caseloads.

That does not seem to be the most likely scenario, however. In most colder regions, including both Canada and the densely populated parts of the northern U.S., cases are still falling. The biggest problem for Alaska and the Mountain West is probably not the weather; it’s the vaccine skepticism. Idaho is the nation’s least vaccinated state, and several other Western states are only slightly ahead of it.

The C.D.C. tracks a range of Covid forecasting models. On average, the models predict that new daily cases in the U.S. will fall roughly another 20 percent over the next three weeks.

The bottom line: There is no reason to expect another Covid surge anytime soon, but surges don’t always announce themselves in advance.

2. Severity looks stable

When the Delta variant began spreading this summer, many people worried that it was both much more contagious than earlier versions of the virus and much more severe. Only one of those two fears seems to be true.

Delta is clearly more contagious, which is the main reason that every metric of the pandemic — cases, hospitalizations and deaths — soared this summer. But a typical Covid case during the Delta wave was about as severe as a typical case during the earlier stages of the pandemic. During the wave in late 2020 and early this year, about 1.2 percent of positive cases led to death; during the Delta wave, the share was 1.1 percent.

Scientific studies trying to answer the severity question more precisely have come to conflicting conclusions. Some have found Delta to be more severe than other versions of the virus, and others have found that it is not. Until the research becomes clearer, the best guess may be that Delta is modestly more severe, which could explain why hospitalizations and death rates have held steady even as vaccination rates have risen.

“Delta may be a little more serious, but not materially so,” Dr. Robert Wachter, chair of the department of medicine at the University of California, San Francisco, told me.

This pattern can influence how you think about your day-to-day activities. If you are vaccinated (and boosted, if eligible) and you were comfortable socializing indoors and without a mask last spring, you can probably feel comfortable doing so again, now or soon. Wachter adds: “Some older people or those with medical conditions may want to be sure that everybody else indoors with them is vaccinated before removing their mask.”

3. The U.S. is underperforming

Despite all the encouraging news, one shadow still hangs over the U.S.: The pandemic does not need to be nearly as bad it is.

About 1,500 Americans have died of Covid every day over the past week. For older age groups, the virus remains a leading cause of death. And the main reason is that millions of Americans have chosen to remain unvaccinated. Many of them are older and have underlying medical conditions, leaving them vulnerable to severe versions of Covid.

For older people, the effects of vaccination are profound. In late August, near the height of the Delta wave, 24 out of every 10,000 unvaccinated Americans 65 and above were hospitalized with Covid symptoms, according to the C.D.C. Among fully vaccinated Americans 65 and above, the number was 1.5 per 10,000.

Even so, many Americans are saying no to a shot. Among affluent countries, the U.S. is one of the least vaccinated, trailing Canada, Australia, Japan, South Korea, Britain, France, Germany, Italy and others. Less vaccination means more death:

(These Times maps show the vaccination rates for each country.)

The low vaccination rate in the U.S. is another consequence of our polarized politics and our high levels of socioeconomic inequality. Only 67 percent of American adults without a four-year college degree have received a shot, compared with 82 percent of college graduates, according to the most recent Kaiser Family Foundation poll. And only 58 percent of self-identified Republicans are vaccinated, compared with 90 percent of Democrats.

It’s a triumph of misinformation. Offered a lifesaving drug to counteract a highly contagious virus, many Americans are instead choosing to take their chances.

The latest data is reassuring. Myocarditis remains very uncommon, and it is almost always mild and temporary. The heart risk from Covid-19 itself is far greater.

Federal regulators are reviewing data on the link between Moderna’s coronavirus vaccine and a rare heart problem in adolescents, the company announced on Sunday. That side effect — myocarditis, an inflammation of the heart muscle — has also worried advisers to federal agencies in deliberations regarding use of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine in younger children and teenagers.

Scientists advising the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention will review the latest data on the condition at a meeting on Tuesday before deciding whether to recommend the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine for younger children.

So how common is myocarditis, really? And should parents be concerned about vaccinating their children?

Absolutely not, said several experts familiar with the recent studies. While the vaccines made by Pfizer-BioNTech and Moderna do seem to be associated with an increased risk of myocarditis, the absolute risk remains very small. Most cases are mild and resolve quickly.

“If you look at an isolated risk, you could really get yourself very worked up and scared,” said Dr. Brian Feingold, an expert on heart inflammation in children at UPMC Children’s Hospital of Pittsburgh.

But Covid-19 itself, he noted, is much more apt to damage the heart permanently: “Statistically, that’s way more likely.”

Myocarditis generally results from infection with a virus or bacteria, and causes symptoms like rapid or irregular heartbeat, chest pain and shortness of breath. Globally, about 10 to 20 people out of every 100,000 develop myocarditis each year, but many others have mild symptoms and may never be diagnosed.

Since the start of the coronavirus pandemic, tens of thousands of children have been hospitalized with Covid, and 657 have died, according to data collected by the C.D.C.

Some children who are infected with the coronavirus may go on to develop long Covid, remaining ill for months after the initial infection is gone, or multisystem inflammatory syndrome, which has affected at least 5,200 children in the United States.

While the risk of myocarditis after vaccination is real, “those are real numbers that are bigger,” Dr. Feingold said.

The incidence of myocarditis after vaccination varies with age, sex and dose — and across studies. But the trend so far suggests that the chances are highest after the second dose of an mRNA vaccine in male patients age 16 to 29.

There are roughly 11 cases of myocarditis for every 100,000 vaccinated male patients in this age group, one study estimated. The odds of myocarditis decrease with age.

Data on adolescents age 12 to 15 years is limited, because the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine only recently became available to them. But so far, heart problems after vaccination seem to be less common in boys of that age than in older men, said Dr. Paul A. Offit, director of the Vaccine Education Center at Children’s Hospital of Philadelphia.

This age distribution is similar to that seen among patients with myocarditis caused by viral infections, Dr. Offit said.

An F.D.A. scientific advisory committee, on which he sits, met last week to review the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine’s safety in children 5 through 11 and ultimately voted to recommend that children be given the vaccine.

“Myocarditis is usually a post-pubertal phenomenon,” Dr. Offit said, adding, “That made me feel better about the fact that we won’t be unpleasantly surprised” by a surge in myocarditis in younger children after they are immunized.

That reassurance may not be enough for some parents. Jeff Gustin, a plant geneticist at the Agriculture Department, said he and two of his sons had elevated heart rates after getting the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine.

His teenage sons recovered quickly, but Dr. Gustin, 42, says he can still feel his heart beating hard, especially when he lies down. Now he is considering a booster of the Johnson &amp; Johnson vaccine, rather than of the Pfizer-BioNTech or Moderna vaccine.

And given the family history, he is hesitant to have his youngest son, who is 11, immunized unless the school district requires it.

But some instances of myocarditis after immunization, like those of Dr. Gustin’s older sons, may be detected simply because of the intense scrutiny on vaccines, said Dr. James de Lemos, a cardiologist at the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center in Dallas, who reported one of the first cases in January.

The myocarditis linked to the vaccines is far less frequent and severe compared with that observed in patients with Covid, and it does not seem to cause lasting harm, Dr. de Lemos said.

The coronavirus can infect cardiac muscle, as well as the lining of blood vessels, putting the heart and other organs at risk of long-term damage. The virus can also weaken the heart enough to require a transplant, and even cause lethal damage.

By contrast, the myocarditis observed after vaccination is mild and transient. “It’s unsettling, but rarely life-threatening,” Dr. de Lemos said.

Still, some Northern European countries, where the Moderna vaccine was already approved for adolescents, have stopped giving it to people age 30 and younger, at least for the moment. That decision was based on evidence suggesting that the risk of myocarditis is higher with the Moderna vaccine than with the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine.

When researchers at Kaiser Permanente Northern California directly compared the two vaccines, for example, they found that in men 18 to 39 the incidence of myocarditis was elevated after a dose of either vaccine, but more so after Moderna’s.

“The rate after Moderna is objectively higher than the rate after Pfizer,” said Dr. Nicola P. Klein, director of the Kaiser Permanente Vaccine Study Center. “It’s consistent, regardless of which cases we use, or whether it’s males only or both sexes.”

The risk after both doses of the Moderna vaccine in people age 18 to 39 was as much as 37 times as high as in the general population, and the rate after two doses of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine in those age 12 to 39 was as much as 19 times as high.

While that may sound alarming, the absolute numbers were still tiny, Dr. de Lemos noted. “Thirty times a small number is still a small number,” he said. “The math still favors vaccination in adolescents and children.”

It’s unclear why myocarditis seems to affect boys more often than girls, and whether it is specific to the coronavirus vaccines or a side effect of all mRNA vaccines. The focus on myocarditis after vaccination may also help to understand the condition generally, experts said.

“I’ll feel a lot better about this when we have an understanding of the pathogenesis, of exactly what is it that’s going on,” Dr. Offit said. If doctors can identify the cause, he added, “we may be able to treat it to some extent.”

Over the summer, as Covid cases started rising from their midyear lows, it became popular to blame Republicans for fueling the pandemic. The argument was that Covid had become a red-state scourge because of lower rates of mask-wearing and vaccination -- along with high doses of vaccine misinformation -- in places that went heavily for Donald Trump.

It even seemed true for a while, with states like Florida, Alabama and Louisiana suffering from a huge surge in cases. But the virus has had a way of making fools of us all.

Take Vermont, which has one of the highest vaccination rates in the nation, and where Joe Biden took 66 percent of the vote. Because of the Delta variant's vigorous attack on even the relatively small number of unvaccinated Vermonters, the state has experienced one of the biggest recent Covid surges, with hospitalizations up by 24 percent in the past two weeks. In Santa Fe County, N.M., where Biden won with 76 percent and 74 percent of the population is fully vaccinated, hospitalizations are up by 40 percent.

You'll find similar trends in Hennepin County, Minn. (Biden, 70 percent), where vaccination rates are high; and in Wayne County, Mich. (Biden, 68 percent), where vaccination rates are relatively low.

Meanwhile, in Florida, Alabama, Louisiana and other red states, cases have plummeted after earlier surges swept through, leaving many with immunity.

We'll see how long things will stay that way, especially if (or, rather, once) the Omicron variant hits American shores. But here's a plea for when it does: Let's put an end to the partisan Covid blame games. They're pointless, divisive and dumb.

Consider the record of Covid score-settling thus far:

Covid is mainly a problem of the big cities! But then it became a tragedy for rural America. (And yes, this is me pleading guilty to a bad argument in the pandemic's early days, when I thought population density would be the main driver of transmission.)

The lab-leak theory is racist right-wing conspiracy talk! Um, except the argument is far from settled on whether or not it's true.

Andrew Cuomo is a model of crisis management! But then it turned out that the disgraced former governor was guilty of one of the worst political decisions in the early months of the pandemic, when he forced New York's nursing homes to take back patients who had been hospitalized with Covid, and later tried to cover up the blunder.

Ron DeSantis is a model of crisis management! The Florida governor did, in fact, do well in the early months of the crisis, when he focused state resources on protecting the elderly, only to later preside over a gigantic spike in cases.

Trump is responsible for hundreds of thousands of Covid deaths that might have been avoided if only someone else had been in the White House! But now Biden has presided over even more deaths, not that anyone should blame him for it.

Anti-vax myths are being driven by right-wing liars! But then people like Sean Hannity of Fox News and Christopher Ruddy of Newsmax urged people to get their shots, while the bulk of vaccine misinformation on social media came from characters like Robert F. Kennedy Jr., Rizza Islam of the Nation of Islam and other alternative-medicine quacks of mostly unguessable political views.

Germany is a model of intelligent consensus-driven action when it comes to public health! But vaccination rates among Germans are still relatively low, mistrust of government is depressingly high, and cases are soaring.

Sweden is a model of good sense when it comes to lockdowns! Well, the Swedes, who avoided lockdowns, have fared relatively better than Spain or Britain, which locked down repeatedly. But, as Bloomberg's Justin Fox points out, the Swedes also fared considerably worse than their Scandinavian neighbors, who took stricter precautions.

The list goes on. There were those on the right who predicted an end to the pandemic based on expected herd-immunity thresholds. There were those on the left who foresaw an end based on vaccination rates. Nature -- on the one hand viral and the other hand human -- embarrassed them both. If the Omicron variant is anything like the Delta one in its transmissibility, it will embarrass them again.

So here are some modest pleas coming out of this Thanksgiving season.

Let's put away our crystal balls and shake up our snow globes instead. We have about as much foresight in this crisis as a snowman in a blizzard.

Let's quit arguing that Covid is a red- or blue-state thing. Yes, Republican areas have tended to have lower vaccination rates, but disease trends have a way of switching directions for reasons none of us really understands.

Let's stop imputing bad faith or recklessness or greed to our partisan opponents. They have loved ones who are just as much at risk of infection as our own.

Let's accept that people have needs and ideas that differ from ours, whether on account of health status, livelihood or deep-seated belief. Lectures, condescension and scorn aren't going to change the way they think.

I have no idea what Omicron will bring, and very slight hopes that we'll be able to exercise any effective form of control over it. But it shouldn't be beyond asking that we stop being beastly to others. We are all riding out the same storm.

A mystery has long surrounded the Great Influenza of 1918-19. Why did a pandemic that killed upward of 50 million people, many of them otherwise healthy young adults, leave such a limited imprint on humanity's cultural memory -- especially in contrast to World War I, which killed less than half as many people? Countless novels and films and monuments investigate or commemorate the trauma that the Great War inflicted on modern consciousness, but the Great Influenza, having torn a deadly path around the world for two years, seemed to be forgotten nearly overnight.

Perhaps the best explanation stems from the century of progress that separates us from its victims. Most of the people alive during the 1918 outbreak were born during the 19th century, when death from infections was tragically familiar, when losing a third of your children to disease was the norm. To them, the mechanized carnage of World War I, with its fighter planes, machine guns and chemical weapons, was a step change in the history of human violence. A terrible flu virus sweeping through your town and killing some of your friends and family -- in an age when it was much more difficult to perceive how global the outbreak was, given the limited scope of most news coverage -- didn't seem all that novel an experience by comparison.

We are not likely to experience the same cultural amnesia with Covid-19. The global population that encountered the SARS-CoV-2 virus had grown accustomed to a world where the burden of infectious disease has been greatly reduced. Before Covid, the most terrifying and deadly new virus to attack the United States was H.I.V., which managed to kill 100,000 Americans in its first eight years of spread here. Covid pulled off the same gruesome feat in four months. You could make the case that Covid will prove to be the true ''great war'' of the early 21st century -- the source of so many genuinely new and terrifying experiences, seared into our collective memory: the hauntingly empty streets of Manhattan and Madrid, the corpses stacked in temporary freezers. Decades from now I suspect I will still be able to conjure the backdrop of incessant sirens in Brooklyn in late March 2020, the creeping terror of it all, the dreadful urgency of trying to make decisions to keep your family safe when so little was understood about the nature of the virus itself.

Whatever is coming next -- and let's hope it is a relatively untraumatic descent, with Covid becoming a manageable if endemic disease, no worse than the flu -- this particular plague is going to leave a profound legacy.

Which then raises the question: What will that legacy be? There are many examples of mass tragedies that inspired meaningful reforms or scientific breakthroughs -- steps forward in human progress that, in the end, most likely saved more lives than the original tragedy claimed. The deadly concentration of the 1854 cholera epidemic in London enabled John Snow to prove that cholera was a disease caused by contaminated water, even though the bacterium itself hadn't been identified yet; Snow's insight probably prevented tens of thousands of deaths in the decades that followed. The occupational safety regulations put in place after the Triangle Shirtwaist factory fire in 1911 undoubtedly saved more lives than the 146 lost in that tragedy.

Of course, for meaningful lessons to be learned from a tragedy -- whether a factory fire or a pandemic -- you have to begin by acknowledging the facts of the event itself. The rise of Covid denialism, in America and elsewhere, is often taken as a reason to doubt that any progress will grow out of the tragedy of Covid-19. But as depressing as anti-science belligerence can sometimes be, there is abundant evidence that we are learning from this epidemic. To begin with, the period from March 2020 to May 2020 almost certainly marked the most significant short-term change ever in worldwide human behavior. Vast sections of the planet effectively froze in place for a few months, and then adopted, en masse, a whole new set of routines to flatten the curve and slow the spread -- a genuinely new trick for Homo sapiens. It was not obvious in advance that such a thing was even possible.

Imagine, if you can bear it, what happens the next time word emerges of a novel virus devastating a midsize city somewhere in the world. The slow-motion reaction that characterized the global response to the news from Wuhan in early 2020 would be radically accelerated. Even without public-health mandates, a significant part of the world's population, particularly in cosmopolitan cities that were hit hard in the early days of Covid, would instantly mask up; where possible, workers would switch back to Zoom; unnecessary travel would cease. No doubt some portion of the population would play down the magnitude of the threat or invent a preposterous conspiracy theory to explain it. But a meaningful number of people would switch back into the ''pandemic mode'' they learned in 2020-21.

Think about how Covid might have been different if, say, 50 percent of the world's urban population had switched into this mode on Feb. 1, 2020. Could this have stopped the virus in its tracks? Perhaps not. But it might have resulted in a global outbreak that looked more like South Korea's experience, or San Francisco's, with death rates a tiny fraction of what they ultimately proved to be.

We are learning from Covid in a more obvious way as well: through the lens of science. After the Great Influenza, it took 13 years -- thanks to a young virologist named Richard Edwin Shope, who noticed veterinary reports about an unusual outbreak of swine flu among pigs in fall 1918 -- to prove that the pandemic had been caused by a virus at all. The contrast with Covid could not be more extreme: We isolated the SARS-CoV-2 virus about 20 days after the outbreak was first reported. Just over a week later, its genome had been sequenced and shared around the world, and the blueprint for what would become the mRNA vaccines (the ones manufactured, ultimately, by Pfizer and Moderna) was essentially complete.

It's important to remember that mRNA vaccines were a promising, if unproven, line of inquiry for years before the pandemic hit; no one could say for sure that they even worked. But now BioNTech has announced that it's ramping up development of a malaria vaccine using messenger RNA as the delivery mechanism, and Moderna and partners announced that they're beginning trials of two mRNA candidate vaccines against H.I.V. Malaria kills roughly 400,000 people a year, H.I.V. nearly a million, and both diseases disproportionately affect the young. If the successful mass rollout of the Covid vaccines winds up accelerating the timeline for these other vaccines, the impact on human life will be enormous.

And just as the Great Influenza slowly nudged scientists toward the development of flu shots, which finally became commonplace in the 1940s, the Covid crisis will redirect vast sums of research dollars toward the development of universal vaccines to protect against all variants of both influenza and coronavirus. Given the relentless, year-in-and-year-out disease burden of flu around the world, a vaccine that reduced its virulence by an order of magnitude would be a life saver of historic proportions.

What about the more subtle psychological legacy of Covid? How will it change the way we perceive the world -- and its risks -- when the pandemic finally subsides? I have a memory from May of this year, taking my 17-year-old son to the Javits Center in Manhattan for his first vaccine, followed by a shopping trip to pick out a tie for his (masked, outdoor) senior prom. At some point waiting in line, I made a halfhearted joke about how we were embarking on the classic father-son ritual of heading out to the mass vaccination site to protect him from the plague. I meant it ironically, but the truth is that for my son's generation, proms and plagues will be part of the rituals of growing up.

There is a loss of innocence in that, but also a hard-earned realism: the knowledge that rare high-risk events like pandemics are not just theoretically possible but likely, in an increasingly urban and interconnected world of nearly eight billion people. As a parent, you want to protect your children from unnecessary anxieties, but not when the threat in question is a real one. My son's generation will forever take pandemics as a basic fact of life, and that assumption, painful as it is, will protect him when the next threat emerges. But maybe, if the science unleashed by this pandemic lives up to its promise, his children -- or perhaps his grandchildren -- could inherit a world where plagues are a thing of the past.

Covid-19 put American infrastructure to the test -- and by most measures, it failed, exposing the unstable, outdated systems that uphold our lives. Students without access to the internet tried to get by on once-a-week printed packets. Nurses wore trash bags as medical equipment. Nobody could buy toilet paper. But these failures, along with so many more, may also have provided the impetus -- in the form of unprecedented federal funding -- for the United States to modernize itself, filling cracks and bridging gaps in our technological, medical and manufacturing capabilities that have been widening for decades.

To date, the federal government has allocated $4.52 trillion in response to Covid-19 -- a staggering figure, one that exceeds the entire federal budget in 2019. Most of that funding comes from just two bills: the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic Security, or CARES, Act, passed in March 2020 ($2.2 trillion), and the American Rescue Plan Act, or A.R.P., from March 2021 ($1.9 trillion). These bills covered a huge range of funding, much of it focused on short-term recovery: Together, they allocated more than $1 trillion in direct aid to Americans in economic need, including $464 billion for additional unemployment benefits and $695 billion for stimulus checks, and also allocated nearly $428 billion for programs to aid small businesses.

But the two bills also made huge investments in the future. In many cases, the small-business aid enabled companies to pivot, by investing in new technologies and retraining workers. And the bills funneled enormous sums into industries for needs that stretch far beyond Covid: $390 billion for health care, $79.3 billion for the transportation sector and $716 billion for states and localities, much of it for modernization efforts. ''The pandemic revealed the brittleness of American infrastructure, including automation and broadband,'' says Ryan Calo, a founding director of the University of Washington Tech Policy Lab. ''It's a once-in-a-generation idea that the government would invest so massively in infrastructure. You have to address problems not only of today but that you anticipate to be perhaps a decade or so down the line.''

Not surprisingly, a large share of Covid-related federal funding went to health spending: $662 billion in total, including biomedical research, according to the Committee for a Responsible Federal Budget. Much of that extended coverage for Americans: $80 billion to continue Medicaid coverage, $23 billion to fund COBRA coverage through September 2021. Another big swath covered vaccine and therapeutics research and development: $53 billion, including $10 billion to Moderna and $11 billion to Pfizer. It also included substantial funding for biomedical research beyond the pharmaceutical companies: about $6 billion directly for research into Covid-19 and vaccines, administered by federal agencies. ''I think this is one of the biggest, fastest biomedical-research efforts that we've ever launched,'' says Matthew Fenton, who oversees grants for the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. N.I.A.I.D.'s operating budget for 2020 was $5.89 billion; the CARES Act, Coronavirus Preparedness and Response Supplemental Appropriations Act and the A.R.P. allocated an additional $4.53 billion, specifically to study and develop treatments, protocols and diagnostics for Covid-19.

Changing research methodologies to develop a vaccine in record time required significant investment -- but that investment will pay off beyond this particular virus. As one example, the funding allowed for huge clinical-trial cohorts, leading to much quicker results; scientists were able to make modifications within a trial to get to an F.D.A.-ready treatment faster. The record turnaround from the Covid-19 vaccine will set a new standard for how fast other treatments can be developed with the appropriate funding. ''Anything that involves getting an F.D.A.-approved drug or medical device -- whether it's heart disease, rheumatoid arthritis, cancer, lupus -- all of these have the potential to benefit from these new approaches to clinical trial,'' Fenton says.

The Covid funds are functioning as a one-time injection to compensate for what has been a trend toward disinvestment in recent years. Decades of previous investment -- not only in biomedical research but in engineering, physics and chemistry -- set up the scientific foundation the Covid-19 vaccine developers built upon. Yet according to the American Association for the Advancement of Science, U.S. government investment in nondefense R.& D. has fallen, slowly but significantly, over time, from 5.8 percent of the federal budget in 1966 to 1.5 percent in 2020. ''The message there is, you don't know what's coming,'' says Neal Lane, a senior fellow in science and technology policy at Rice University's Baker Institute for Public Policy and the former director of the National Science Foundation. ''You need to be making a sustainable, long-term, growing investment in science and engineering so that you're ready to address these big crises.''

When the pandemic brought the supply chain to a standstill and jolted product demand, small American manufacturers scrambled. ''As a young company, not having large cash reserves was the really scary part -- not knowing if we're going to be able to make payroll, not knowing if we're going to be able to get raw material,'' says Terry Hill, the owner of Rapid Application Group in Broken Arrow, Okla. Before the pandemic, Hill and his 10 employees, mostly fellow veterans, 3-D printed specialty aircraft parts. ''All of that came to a screeching halt,'' Hill says. ''It felt like going back into a deployment again, where we knew a little bit of information but not the whole developed picture.'' To survive the pandemic, Hill turned to the Oklahoma Manufacturing Alliance, a chapter of the federal Manufacturing Extension Partnership, which provides assistance to manufacturers with fewer than 500 employees. With additional funding from the CARES Act, the alliance gave RAG logistical help, including aid in securing P.P.P. funds and connections to local suppliers when the global supply chain broke down. Thanks to the Oklahoma Manufacturing Alliance, Hill was able to get F.D.A. approval, source new sterilizable materials and purchase other materials to start supplying in the health care space -- all without laying off a single employee. ''Overnight, we went from printing for private space-travel companies to designing our own masks,'' he says. ''If it wasn't for the pandemic, and having those P.P.P. funds, we would have never dove into health care.''

The investments permanently changed RAG's business model. Today the company receives as many orders from health care as from aerospace, building on relationships established during the pandemic, as with a hospital in Tulsa. Originally, RAG supplied masks to the hospital; now the company is designing parts for robots to sanitize its infectious-disease wards. Without the federal funds, Hill says, ''I would be surprised if RAG was still here.''

RAG is one of thousands of manufacturers able to advance technologically thanks to federal funding during the pandemic. The CARES Act and the A.R.P. allocated $892 million in additional funding to the National Institute of Standards and Technology and the National Science Foundation, largely to meet changing demands in industry. ''The circumstances changed during the pandemic,'' says Rob Ivester, the acting director of the Manufacturing Extension Partnership, which is part of NIST. ''You had a much harder time going to that overseas source to get that specialty tooling, you had the sudden availability of labor resources inside your shop because your customers for your traditional products were not buying, and you're trying to keep your business alive.'' Small companies like RAG were forced to update their technology to stay in business. The CARES Act directly funded training for small manufacturers, and M.E.P. centers helped thousands of small manufacturers adopt technologies like cobotics (robots to collaborate with employees on the assembly line) and 3-D printing. ''In the near term, they benefit because they're able to keep their shop busy and start making new products,'' Ivester says. ''But it's also a longer-term investment, because now they have that capability to essentially pivot on demand, and that makes them a much more agile and competitive company.''

Infrastructure, conjuring as it does images of potholes and rusted water pipes, often goes overlooked; politicians would rather be associated with cutting ribbons than maintaining systems. Paradoxically, that has meant the great leaps in American infrastructure often come from moments of great lack: the greater the crisis, the larger the possible investment. The Great Depression led to the New Deal, which established the Federal Housing Administration and brought electricity to the rural United States; the Great Recession led to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act, which directly funded improvements to 2,700 bridges and 42,000 miles of road.

In the 1930s, modernizing the country meant electricity. In the 2020s, it means broadband. ''Our economy evolves and changes,'' says Todd Schmit, an associate professor of applied economics and management at Cornell University, ''and it's really necessary now to think about broadband in an infrastructure space.'' The digital divide is sharp in the United States: Census Bureau data shows that broadband access is concentrated in cities and in the Northeast, Florida and the West Coast. In rural areas and the South, West and Midwest, far fewer Americans have access. In the South, 111 counties have broadband subscription rates at or below 55 percent. The divide is often stark even within a state: In Virginia counties adjacent to Washington and Richmond, 85 percent of households have broadband; counties in the center of the state have less than 65 percent of households with subscriptions. According to research from BroadbandNow, a majority of counties in Alaska have zero access to broadband; in Mississippi and West Virginia, less than 60 percent of households have broadband access. A 2019 Arizona State University study found that nearly one in five tribal reservation residents had no home internet access.

This was all true before the pandemic, but when Americans were suddenly forced to work, learn, socialize and seek medical care online, the disparity in access became glaringly obvious -- so obvious that lawmakers had no choice but to address it. The CARES Act opened the tap just a little, appropriating $100 million as grants for broadband in rural areas. In December 2020, the Consolidated Appropriations Act established more than $1.5 billion in broadband grants, including nearly $1 billion for tribes, which face some of the worst internet access in the country. The American Rescue Plan included $20.4 billion exclusively for broadband access, and gave states and localities about $388 billion in flexible funding that can be used for broadband. Across the country, this money is already teeing up projects to address digital disparities: satellite connectivity for remote tribes in Alaska, a grant program in rural Colorado, last-mile broadband deployment programs in Virginia, installing fiber cables in Arizona, improving outdoor connectivity in Georgia.

The $1.2 trillion infrastructure bill, signed into law on Nov. 15, will enable states to build on Covid-related funding. The CARES Act and the A.R.P. kept localities and companies moving forward rather than falling back during the pandemic; the infrastructure bill, which includes $312 billion for transportation, $65 billion for broadband and $108 billion for the electrical grid, takes an additional sizable step in that direction. But neither funding source includes the long-term investment needed for sustained progress.

Take the broadband build out as a key example: Out of the $65 billion allocated to broadband in the recent infrastructure bill, the bulk -- $45 billion -- is for installing broadband, compared with $17 billion for ongoing access and subsidy grants. ''We're going to give a big shot of investment for infrastructure and capital expenditures to build this system, but then we need to provide some subsidized assistance annually along the way, to keep it in the long-term,'' Schmit says. ''If you can build it, and then they get things going and everybody gets broadband, and in five years everybody's bankrupt, then what have we solved?'' The billions in federal funding may build access to broadband, but it offers no guarantee to sustain it, which is especially crucial for the rural broadband access that this legislation tries to address. Schmit studies broadband access in areas of upstate New York with fewer than 10 subscribers per mile, where offering service often isn't cost-effective.

''If we can agree that access to broadband is a public good -- for educating our children, for access to health care, for expanding business opportunities -- there should be a defensible basis for government assistance in funding the operations of those programs,'' he says. ''But I think that's a harder story to tell.''

Charley Locke is a writer, an editor and a story producer who often works on articles for The New York Times for Kids. Christopher Payne is a photographer who specializes in architecture and American industry. He has documented many industrial processes for the magazine, including one of America's last pencil factories, Martin guitars and The Times's own printing plant.

Over the summer, as Covid cases started rising from their midyear lows, it became popular to blame Republicans for fueling the pandemic. The argument was that Covid had become a red-state scourge because of lower rates of mask-wearing and vaccination — along with high doses of vaccine misinformation — in places that went heavily for Donald Trump.

It even seemed true for a while, with states like Florida, Alabama and Louisiana suffering from a huge surge in cases. But the virus has had a way of making fools of us all.

Take Vermont, which has one of the highest vaccination rates in the nation, and where Joe Biden took 66 percent of the vote. Because of the Delta variant’s vigorous attack on even the relatively small number of unvaccinated Vermonters, the state has experienced one of the biggest recent Covid surges, with hospitalizations up by 24 percent in the past two weeks. In Santa Fe County, N.M., where Biden won with 76 percent and 74 percent of the population is fully vaccinated, hospitalizations are up by 40 percent.

You’ll find similar trends in Hennepin County, Minn. (Biden, 70 percent), where vaccination rates are high; and in Wayne County, Mich. (Biden, 68 percent), where vaccination rates are relatively low.

Meanwhile, in Florida, Alabama, Louisiana and other red states, cases have plummeted after earlier surges swept through, leaving many with immunity.

We’ll see how long things will stay that way, especially if (or, rather, once) the Omicron variant hits American shores. But here’s a plea for when it does: Let’s put an end to the partisan Covid blame games. They’re pointless, divisive and dumb.

Consider the record of Covid score-settling thus far:

Covid is mainly a problem of the big cities! But then it became a tragedy for rural America. (And yes, this is me pleading guilty to a bad argument in the pandemic’s early days, when I thought population density would be the main driver of transmission.)

The lab-leak theory is racist right-wing conspiracy talk! Um, except the argument is far from settled on whether or not it’s true.

Andrew Cuomo is a model of crisis management! But then it turned out that the disgraced former governor was guilty of one of the worst political decisions in the early months of the pandemic, when he forced New York’s nursing homes to take back patients who had been hospitalized with Covid, and later tried to cover up the blunder.

Ron DeSantis is a model of crisis management! The Florida governor did, in fact, do well in the early months of the crisis, when he focused state resources on protecting the elderly, only to later preside over a gigantic spike in cases.

Trump is responsible for hundreds of thousands of Covid deaths that might have been avoided if only someone else had been in the White House! But now Biden has presided over even more deaths, not that anyone should blame him for it.

Anti-vax myths are being driven by right-wing liars! But then people like Sean Hannity of Fox News and Christopher Ruddy of Newsmax urged people to get their shots, while the bulk of vaccine misinformation on social media came from characters like Robert F. Kennedy Jr., Rizza Islam of the Nation of Islam and other alternative-medicine quacks of mostly unguessable political views.

Germany is a model of intelligent consensus-driven action when it comes to public health! But vaccination rates among Germans are still relatively low, mistrust of government is depressingly high, and cases are soaring.

Sweden is a model of good sense when it comes to lockdowns! Well, the Swedes, who avoided lockdowns, have fared relatively better than Spain or Britain, which locked down repeatedly. But, as Bloomberg’s Justin Fox points out, the Swedes also fared considerably worse than their Scandinavian neighbors, who took stricter precautions.

The list goes on. There were thoseon the right who predicted an end to the pandemic based on expected herd-immunity thresholds. There were those on the left who foresaw an end based on vaccination rates. Nature — on the one hand viral and the other hand human — embarrassed them both. If the Omicron variant is anything like the Delta one in its transmissibility, it will embarrass them again.

So here are some modest pleas coming out of this Thanksgiving season.

Let’s put away our crystal balls and shake up our snow globes instead. We have about as much foresight in this crisis as a snowman in a blizzard.

Let’s quit arguing that Covid is a red- or blue-state thing. Yes, Republican areas have tended to have lower vaccination rates, but disease trends have a way of switching directions for reasons none of us really understands.

Let’s stop imputing bad faith or recklessness or greed to our partisan opponents. They have loved ones who are just as much at risk of infection as our own.

Let’s accept that people have needs and ideas that differ from ours, whether on account of health status, livelihood or deep-seated belief. Lectures, condescension and scorn aren’t going to change the way they think.

I have no idea what Omicron will bring, and very slight hopes that we’ll be able to exercise any effective form of control over it. But it shouldn’t be beyond asking that we stop being beastly to others. We are all riding out the same storm.

The treatment, known as molnupiravir, could be authorized in the United States within days, and available within weeks, if the F.D.A. follows the committee's recommendation.

A federal advisory committee on Tuesday voted to recommend that the government for the first time authorize the use of an antiviral pill to combat the worst effects of Covid-19.

The advisory committee, in a surprisingly narrow 13-to-10 vote, endorsed the pill from Merck, while public health officials worldwide raced to buttress their defenses against the newly emerging Omicron variant of the coronavirus.

The Merck treatment, known as molnupiravir, has been shown to modestly reduce the risk of hospitalization and death from Covid. The pill could be authorized for use in the United States within days and available to patients within weeks.

In the coming weeks, the F.D.A. may also authorize a similar pill from Pfizer that appears to be significantly more effective than Merck's. Together, the arrival of the two easy-to-use treatments could provide a cushion against a resurgent virus.

The F.D.A. advisory panel, a group of experts on antimicrobial drugs, recommended that Merck's treatment be authorized for people with Covid who are at high risk of becoming severely ill. That would most likely cover tens of millions of Americans who are older or have medical conditions such as obesity, diabetes or heart disease.

But the committee's close vote reflected doubts about the pill's effectiveness and concerns that it could cause reproductive harm.

''The efficacy of this product is not overwhelmingly good,'' said Dr. David Hardy, an infectious disease physician in Los Angeles. Still, he voted to recommend the drug, saying ''there is a need for something like this.''

Other members of the committee who voted against authorization said more research was needed about the drug's safety. ''The risk of widespread effects on potential birth defects, especially delayed effects on the male, has not been adequately studied,'' said Dr. Sankar Swaminathan, an infectious disease specialist at the University of Utah.

The pills, which doctors will prescribe and will be dispensed at pharmacies, are much more convenient and are expected to reach many more people than the monoclonal antibody treatments that have typically been used to aid high-risk Covid patients. The antibody treatments are expensive and typically given intravenously at hospitals or clinics.

The Biden administration has been hoping that the emergence of the antiviral pills from Merck and Pfizer will help end the most acute phase of the pandemic. The U.S. government has spent billions of dollars to secure millions of treatment courses of the new pills.

Merck's clinical trials primarily enrolled people who were infected with the Delta, Mu and Gamma variants of the coronavirus. Scientists have yet to run experiments to see how well the pills block Omicron viruses from replicating. But there are reasons to think they would remain effective even if the variant can sometimes evade vaccines, as well as monoclonal antibodies.

Omicron has more than 30 mutations on the so-called spike protein that latches on to human cells. Some of those mutations may make it hard for vaccine-produced antibodies to attack the virus.

But the pills do not target the spike protein. Instead, they weaken two proteins involved in the virus's replication machinery. Omicron carries only one mutation in each of those proteins, and neither looks as if it would stop the pills from doing their jobs.

A Merck executive, Dr. Nicholas Kartsonis, told the advisory panel on Tuesday that the company was ''feverishly working'' to collect samples from people infected with the Omicron variant that it can use in laboratory studies to help determine whether the drug will work against the variant.

''We expect based on what we know about the Omicron variant that molnupiravir would be effective,'' he said.

Even before the expected arrival of Omicron, coronavirus cases are rising in many regions of the United States, notably the Upper Midwest and Northeast. The sharp increase has raised fears about a winter surge fueled not only by the new variant but also by indoor holiday gatherings and the refusal of tens of millions of Americans to be vaccinated.

In a clinical trial, molnupiravir was found to reduce by 30 percent the risk of hospitalization or death when given to high-risk, unvaccinated volunteers within five days after they started showing symptoms. It appears to be substantially less effective than Pfizer's pill, which was found to reduce that risk by 89 percent. Monoclonal antibody treatments have been found to reduce the risk of hospitalization or death by at least 70 percent.

Assuming the F.D.A. authorizes the use of molnupiravir, supplies are likely to be limited at first.

In addition, the compressed time frame of getting the pills could pose a challenge. Merck's treatment is supposed to be given within five days of the start of symptoms and is taken as 40 pills over five days.

Patients will most likely need to test positive for the coronavirus and see a physician, who will write a prescription for a pack of pills that can be picked up at a pharmacy. But it often takes days to get results from a PCR test, and in some parts of the country it is hard to find tests that return results within 15 minutes. In addition, many people don't have regular doctors to turn to for prescriptions.

The Biden administration has ordered enough courses of Merck's treatment, at about $700 per person, for 3.1 million people. Merck is expected to supply those pills before February. By contrast, Pfizer is expected to supply only enough of its pills to cover 300,000 people in the United States before the end of February.

One question hanging over the treatment is how many eligible Americans will refuse to take the new pills. In a Morning Consult poll released this week, about half of unvaccinated adults -- the primary group expected to need the pills -- said they would not take F.D.A.-authorized antiviral pills if they got sick with Covid.

A number of committee members raised questions about the safety of the pill. The treatment works by inserting errors into the virus's genes. Some scientists say there is a theoretical risk that it could trigger mutations in cells as well, potentially causing reproductive harm or a long-term risk of cancer.

''The overall risk of mutagenicity in humans is considered low,'' Dr. Aimee Hodowanec, a senior medical officer at the F.D.A., said at the meeting, referring to the potential for the drug to induce mutations in the DNA of people taking it.

Merck says its laboratory tests and clinical trial data indicate that the drug is safe and does not cause worrisome mutations in humans.

Members of the F.D.A. panel said the pills generally should not be given to pregnant women.

Merck executives said on Tuesday that the company would begin a program to track any women who take molnupiravir while pregnant.

Britain, which authorized Merck's pill in early November, recommended that it not be given to pregnant or breastfeeding women and that women who could become pregnant use contraception while taking the drug and for four days after.

In two short weeks, as the year closed out, the Omicron variant drove coronavirus case counts to record levels, upended air travel and left gaping staffing holes at police departments, firehouses and hospitals.

And that was at a time many people were off for the holiday season. Now comes Monday, with millions of Americans having traveled back home to start school and work again, and no one is sure of what comes next.

Most of the nation’s largest school districts have decided to forge ahead and remain open, at least for the time being, citing the toll that remote learning has taken on students’ mental health and academic success. And the rising number of cases has not yet been followed by a proportionate increase in hospitalizations and deaths, though hospitalizations have increased in recent days — a sign that the Omicron variant seems to cause fewer cases of severe illness.

But the highly contagious variant is still racing across the country, and teachers, parents and workplaces are bracing for the impact.

“I figured that over these two weeks of break, everyone has been everywhere visiting everybody,” said Teresa Morrison, 48, who plans to keep her 8-year-old daughter Tristan, who suffers from severe bronchitis, from attending in-person classes in San Antonio. “So I really just anticipate January to be a disaster.”

The rapid spread of the Omicron variant has left companies across industries — from meatpacking to retail — with a thinning work force, especially after months of record high resignations. Thousands of flights have been canceled and National Guard troops have been activated to help staff hospitals.

The spiking case counts have also flummoxed the dozens of companies that sent their employees to work from home in March 2020, as Covid was first sweeping the country. Some offices that had reopened advised workers to stay home. Others, including major companies like Apple and Google, have extended their work-from-home arrangements.

In schools, the spread of Covid-19 has been limited, but Omicron has renewed some fears just as a sense of normalcy seemed within reach.

For many teachers, students and parents, the fall semester had seemed promising. By mid-December, Brayden Boren, a high school English teacher in San Antonio, had begun to feel as if an end to the long, exhausting battle against the pandemic was within sight.

Then Omicron arrived in Texas. By the week of Dec. 11, it accounted for about 25 percent of all new infections, according to state data. A week later, it spiked to 85 percent. In the past two weeks, the number of new cases being reported each day in Texas has increased by 240 percent.

Mr. Boren, 27, who has not had the virus, saw it all around him. “Even in my small, little friends group, they were popping up, one by one by one,” he said. “No one was really getting it, until now.”

Now, Mr. Boren is questioning whether a return to in-person learning makes any sense. “It’s a hard time to be a teacher. How far can we push ourselves?”

Health officials have warned that the unvaccinated remain most at risk of severe illness or death from Omicron. More than 70 percent of people 12 and older in the United States are fully vaccinated, according to the C.D.C. About a quarter of children between ages 5 and 11 have received at least one dose of a vaccine. Children under 5 are still not eligible for them.

For business leaders, the constant change in public health conditions and guidelines has meant acclimating to a new level of flexibility. “They don’t give you a playbook at Harvard Business School on the pandemic,” said Yancey Spruill, chief executive of the tech company DigitalOcean, which told its staff it will allow remote work indefinitely.

Across the country, workers were steeling themselves for months of disruptions to come.

“I’ve been working through most of the pandemic, and I hadn’t tested positive before Omicron,” said Amelia Smoak, 29, who works at a restaurant and bar in Manhattan’s East Village neighborhood. She is fully vaccinated but recently recovered from a mild case of Covid. She added that business has gotten far slower as case counts rise: “Tips have been stable, but head count went down drastically.”

Scientists are projecting that the country’s sharp increase in cases will crest by the middle of January. But much about the new variant remains uncertain, and experts remain worried that hospitals might be overwhelmed.

The number of cases in New York continues to rise steeply, yet city school officials have vowed to keep schools open, embracing increased testing as an alternative to closing classrooms.

Schools in Chicago, Washington and most other major cities have announced they also plan to reopen this week, many with increased testing regimens. But some districts — including public schools in Cleveland; Prince George’s County, Md., a suburb of Washington, D.C.; Newark, N.J.; Mt. Vernon, N.Y.; and Jersey City, N.J. — will transition to remote learning for one week or more in January.

In Chicago, where businesses have remained open as cases have spiked to their highest levels of the pandemic, public school leaders said they planned to return to class as scheduled on Monday despite concerns from the city’s powerful teachers’ union about safety precautions.

“If they shut down the restaurants, they shut down all the events, every component of the city and state, then hey, I’m not going to put my families at risk, I’m not going to force them to take their children to school,” said Pedro Martinez, the chief executive of Chicago Public Schools. He added: “But short of that, what is the logic of thinking that somehow shutting down schools is going to help this pandemic? I don’t see the logic.”

Chicago Teachers Union officials have criticized the district’s testing, ventilation and staffing plans, and they expressed concern about the potential for breakthrough cases among vaccinated employees.

Stacy Davis Gates, the union’s vice president, predicted chaos when classes resume on Monday. On Thursday, the union asked school officials to put in place a number of new precautions, including a requirement that all returning students test negative for Covid-19, or pause in-person instruction in the absence of widespread testing.

“We’re very concerned about short-staffed buildings,” Ms. Davis Gates said. “We’re very concerned that parents will lose confidence and not send their kids back to our school communities.”

Several Chicago-area colleges announced either delayed starts or shifts to remote learning, including DePaul University, the University of Chicago and Northwestern University.

Similar announcements came from a number of major universities across the country, from the University of California system to New York University, Syracuse, and Binghamton in New York, bringing the number of U.S. colleges and universities announcing a move to remote instruction for part or all of January to nearly 50.

In Cleveland, parents had been bracing for possible remote instruction since the day before the winter break, when the district closed 14 of its 90 schools because faculty and staff members were out sick. The announcement came midweek that the 35,000-student district would begin its spring semester remotely, with Eric S. Gordon, the district’s chief executive, citing a “dramatic increase” in the infection rate in Cleveland.

Ohio set records in recent days for both Covid infections and hospitalizations, prompting the state’s governor, Mike DeWine, a Republican, to mobilize additional members of the Ohio National Guard to help at hospitals — one of several states to do so.

Stacey Caprinolo, whose 15-year-old daughter Genevieve is a sophomore at Cleveland School of the Arts high school, took the news of the remote return to classes in stride. But not knowing when classes might resume made the uncertainty of the situation unsettling.

“It’s a week by week thing. It’s harder to plan,” Ms. Caprinolo said.

By moving to remote learning, Cleveland and several districts in the city’s suburbs were bucking the state’s Republican leadership, which had urged regular school sessions.

For some parents, returning to work was the least of their worries.

Kelli Gay’s holiday season was halted abruptly with two phone calls in mid-December.

Both her husband and oldest son had been exposed to Covid-19 at separate holiday parties in Florida. It would not be long before the entire household — two parents and three children — tested positive for the virus, stunning them back to the reality of the pandemic’s enduring presence. All of them had been at least partly vaccinated.

“We were still wearing our masks, but we were re-engaging with people and attended events,” said Ms. Gay, 45, a grants director at the Port of Miami who lost two relatives to Covid in 2020. “Then we got the phone calls.”

The test results precipitated a quiet Christmas but Ms. Gay was faced with a bigger crisis: What to do with her three school-age children when school resumes on Monday?

The school district where Ms. Gay lives in Miramar, Fla., where cases have shot up dramatically, is not offering virtual alternatives. And the state passed a law authorizing parents, rather than school districts, to decide whether their children wear a mask to school. That means her children can possibly be in classes with maskless students during this latest wave.

“High anxiety would be how I would describe what I am feeling,” she said. “So now our hopes are riding on enforcing the home rules, on the kids staying masked at school, keeping their distance and a little bottle of hand sanitizer in their backpacks.”

Dana Goldstein, Emma Goldberg, Lauren Hirsch and Lola Fadulu contributed reporting.

Dana Goldstein, Emma Goldberg, Lauren Hirsch and Lola Fadulu contributed reporting.

Would you pay $28 — the cost of a book — to re-experience the Covid-19 pandemic, day by day? Heck no? Well, it turns out to be deeply therapeutic. Reading this beautiful, bittersweet memoir — which Finch, a mystery writer, structures like a diary — feels like group therapy, a decanting and reprocessing of the little memories, the traumas and the observations that often got swept away in the wash of big scientific and political arguments.

Things like: what we wanted to stock up on when we feared, in March 2020, that there’d be massive food shortages, and what that revealed to us about what we love and who we are. Finch recalls all the distinct varieties of fear we felt, and our wish not to admit — even to our friends — how afraid we were, or how wrong we had been. He reminds us that many people found elements of locked-down life pleasurable, even preferable, before it became necessary to tamp down those feelings in deference to the pandemic’s broader status as a tragedy.

And he takes profound, frank, luxurious baths in the emotions of distaste and despair, which dominated during the pandemic. His memoir incisively suggests they reveal the depth of our love, actually, for other aspects of our world that we didn’t want to lose.

THE FIRST SHOTS
The Epic Rivalries and Heroic Science Behind the Race to the Coronavirus Vaccine
By Brendan Borrell
320 pp. Mariner Books. $28.

In this tale of America’s pandemic response, heroic scientists and public servants whip out their lab coats to save the country. The title is misleading. Borrell doesn’t only offer an inside look at the warp-speed vaccine-development process and rollout but also the government’s struggles over mask policy and the release of statistics while its own quarterback, ex-President Donald Trump, was running interference on his team.

Borrell had great access inside the Trump administration, and there are juicy details here. But his effort to make the pandemic-response story read like a cross between a Marvel movie and a police procedural falls flat. Veteran bureaucrats are “dudes” who have “seen some [expletive].” They curse so much that you wonder if their quotes were selected for the presence of an obscenity rather than for their content; the story becomes confusing, cluttered with characters who might not have needed to be there if they hadn’t nicknamed the Moderna vaccine “Yasssss Bitchhhhh.” Long ago, “The First Shots” was optioned by HBO, and it’s not clear if readers were the intended audience or TV producers.

A SHOT TO SAVE THE WORLD
The Inside Story of the Life-or-Death Race for a Covid-19 Vaccine
By Gregory Zuckerman
384 pp. Portfolio. $30.

This account of the race to develop Covid-19 vaccines contains many of the same episodes as “The First Shots,” down to a particular molecular biochemist’s ski-lodge realization that SARS-CoV-2 was dangerous. But it’s more focused and, to its benefit, traces its story much further back in time. Zuckerman answers a question still circulating among both vaccine fans and skeptics: How could scientists develop the Covid-19 vaccines so quickly?

The answer is that they didn’t. The Covid-19 vaccines were built on the backs of decades-long efforts to create other vaccines, like one for the Zika virus and, in particular, several failures to develop a useful H.I.V. vaccine. Paradoxically, Zuckerman’s might be the vaccine-science book for a vaccine skeptic because of its detailed accounts of those failures. The scientists it portrays are not perfect, not Marvel heroes, but people who struggle — and who then learn from those struggles. Stéphane Bancel, the C.E.O. of Moderna, and Ugur Sahin, the C.E.O. of BioNTech, are depicted in especially fascinating relief, though Ozlem Tureci, Sahin’s female co-founder, is somewhat neglected.

VIRAL
The Search for the Origin of Covid-19
By Alina Chan and Matt Ridley
416 pp. Harper. $29.99.

Chan and Ridley write with urgency in defending why people ought to take the SARS-CoV-2 lab-leak hypothesis seriously. Even if a reader doesn’t agree with them, that urgency inspires gripping depictions of what viruses are, how infectious-disease laboratories work and wonderfully lucid descriptions of bats.

But after gathering a lot of puzzle pieces, Chan and Ridley are unwilling to assemble it into a picture — to take a final stand on whether they think Covid likely did emerge from a laboratory accident. They assert most strongly, rather, that the people who want to investigate a lab-leak theory are persecuted and mocked as conspiracy theorists. This strays into tedious cancel-culture territory and is, anyway, no longer true. And also: Does it matter? Chan and Ridley powerfully recount how dangerous pathogens can both leak from a lab and emerge in nature. Ultimately, though, it’s not clear why knowing how the pandemic came about would immunize us against all the other missteps that made it so devastating.

AFTER LOCKDOWN
A Metamorphosis
By Bruno Latour
Translated by Julie Rose
180 pp. Polity. $59.95.

Latour’s astonishing meditation orbits the question of whether there is any good that might come from the pandemic. In the process, he tips over all kinds of American sacred cows. Most striking might be how Latour demolishes the supposed opposition between feeling “free” — as in, free to not obey lockdowns or even care about Covid-19 — and feeling aware that one’s life is inextricably intertwined with the lives of others and that one must, say, get vaccinated out of a duty to them. Real freedom, Latour says, comes in acknowledging the truth. It is the feeling of relief and liberation one gets when one accepts a reality that may in a literal sense be burdensome. True freedom is in knowing, for example, that you aren’t just “free” to go to a packed bar during an outbreak when you also work at a nursing home.

And locked down, he suggests, we may have become more in touch with truths — like our interrelatedness — that we previously strove to ignore. He launches a plea to respect the instincts that emerged during the pandemic — he insists we not forget them.

Airlines and passengers are ending the year with many of their plans upended. And New Year's weekend may be bumpy, too.

Airlines may have thought their pandemic troubles were behind them in the fall as a coronavirus wave subsided and travelers increasingly took to the skies. But a new virus surge and winter storms have left the carriers and their passengers in a holiday mess.

Heading into the New Year's weekend, when return flights will produce another crest in air travel, airlines have been canceling more than 1,000 flights a day to, from or within the United States. Carriers and their employees say the latest chapter of the pandemic, the Omicron variant, has cut deeply into the ability to staff flights, even though a vast majority of crew members are vaccinated.

''I've never seen a meltdown like this in my life,'' said Angelo Cucuzza, the director of organizing at the Transport Workers Union, which represents flight attendants at JetBlue. ''They just can't keep up with the amount of folks that are testing positive.''

JetBlue has been one of the airlines hardest hit, canceling 17 percent of its flights on Thursday, according to the air travel data site FlightAware. The carrier said Wednesday that it would cut about 1,280 flights through mid-January, citing the rise in virus cases in the Northeast, where its operations and crews are concentrated.

And then there was the weather, always a volatile element in holiday travel but particularly challenging in recent days -- notably in the Pacific Northwest, where heavy snowfall and record low temperatures grounded planes last weekend.

The next few days may be just as frustrating. Storms in Southern California and the Northwest could combine to dump snow on airline hubs in Denver and Chicago, with severe thunderstorms threatening Dallas Fort Worth International Airport, too, according to Dan DePodwin, director of forecast operations at AccuWeather.

Alaska Airlines, whose main hub is Seattle-Tacoma International Airport, went so far as to suggest that people put off nonessential travel until the new year. The carrier was hit hard again Thursday, with 14 percent of its flights canceled, as Seattle got more snow.

As many as 10 million people may fly from Thursday through Monday, according to Transportation Security Administration estimates. For months, airlines have been preparing reserves of workers for the holiday crush. But those measures were inadequate in a fast-changing situation, and many passengers were frustrated.

''Even though it's been two years with Covid, it does not seem like they have this figured out,'' said Sabine Malloy, whose plan to rendezvous with her boyfriend in Alaska to see the northern lights was upended on Tuesday when both their flights on Delta Air Lines -- hers from Southern California, his from Denver -- were canceled. Delta told them that it could not rebook them for several days, she said, so they canceled their plans -- after her boyfriend had driven seven hours from South Dakota for his flight.

Trying to change plans before departing was also daunting. A traveler trying to rebook a family trip on American Airlines encountered a recording saying to expect a four-hour wait for a callback from an agent.

Some say airlines shoulder some of the blame for the turmoil. The industry received $54 billion in federal aid to keep workers employed throughout the pandemic, assistance that came with a ban on layoffs. But carriers were able to thin their ranks by offering buyouts and early-retirement packages to thousands of workers.

Airlines started hiring again as the travel rebound took off this year, but most have yet to fully restore their work forces: The industry employed nearly 413,000 people in October, down almost 9 percent from the same month in 2019, according to federal data. Airlines have had trouble turning a profit as passenger volumes remain about 15 percent below prepandemic levels.

The industry looked to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in recent days for a partial solution to its staffing problems, lobbying for the 10-day isolation period recommended for those infected with the coronavirus to be reduced to five days. Some scientists, unaffiliated with airlines, made a similar suggestion to bolster strained work forces in other realms, like hospitals.

On Monday, the C.D.C. shifted its guidance to five days of isolation for people whose symptoms have ended or are abating, followed by five days wearing a mask. The agency said the change was motivated by findings that the coronavirus was mostly transmitted one to two days before symptoms appear and two to three days afterward.

On Tuesday, in a memo seen by The New York Times, JetBlue told employees that it would expect those ''who have no symptoms, or whose symptoms are improving, to come back to work after five days.'' Crew members may remain on leave if they provide a doctor's note, but they won't be paid as if they were working, according to Mr. Cucuzza of the Transport Workers Union.

Asked for comment, JetBlue said, ''The health and safety of our crew members and customers remains our top priority as we work through this pandemic.''

Delta is providing five days' sick leave for infected workers, with two additional paid sick days if they choose to be tested on Day 5 and the results are positive.

The shorter isolation time is fueling a debate in the industry. The Association of Flight Attendants-CWA, which represents nearly 50,000 flight attendants at 17 airlines, urged maintaining a 10-day isolation period in a letter to airlines on Tuesday.

''We believe this is the wrong move for aviation as it accepts that infectious people will be put back on the job or flying as passengers on our planes,'' Sara Nelson, the union's president, wrote. Several flight attendants interviewed expressed concerns that potentially contagious colleagues might return to work without being tested.

Airlines always prepare for turmoil, particularly around the holidays, when bad winter weather in one place can knock an entire system off balance. But the industry has been hit especially hard this year.

After two airlines, American and Southwest, canceled thousands of flights in October because of fierce weather and a brief shortage of air traffic controllers, they vowed to address the problems, offering bonuses to encourage employees to work throughout the holiday period, stepping up hiring and pruning flight plans. Both have avoided widespread cancellations this holiday season.

''We realized that we have got to make sure that we have staffing in place,'' David Seymour, American's chief operating officer, said in an interview. The airline recalled several thousand flight attendants from leave last month and this month and hired almost 600 more.

When chaos strikes, airlines engage in a complicated choreography to get out of it.

The main goal, airlines and aviation experts say, is to minimize the effect on passengers. But that's easier said than done.

Alaska Airlines spent months laying plans for this holiday season, investing in staff and equipment to deal with the winter weather and lining up backup flight crews, according to Constance von Muehlen, its chief operating officer.

The airline managed staff calling in sick at high rates by offering extra pay for others to fill in, but sustained snowfall and record low temperatures in the Seattle area forced it to cancel nearly one-third of its flights on Sunday, about one-quarter on Monday and about one-fifth on Tuesday.

''Once you get your day off poorly, there's nothing you can do to catch up,'' Ms. von Muehlen said.

On Tuesday, the airline issued a stark announcement. Alaska would cut about 20 percent of flights out of Seattle in the coming days to allow extra time to de-ice planes. It also ''strongly'' urged customers to delay nonessential travel until after this weekend.

''Our values guided our decision,'' she said. ''We need to be as realistic as possible in what we will be able to operate and to let people know, as difficult as it is for us to do that.''

Getting flight crews in place can be especially tricky, with workers dispersed throughout the country and subject to various regulations. Flight attendants are generally required to have nine hours of rest between shifts, for example.

The Omicron variant has only confounded that already complicated process.

Capt. James Belton, a spokesman for the roughly 13,500 United Airlines pilots in the Air Line Pilots Association, confirmed that the variant is creating challenges.

''Our sick calls are above normal,'' he said. Many pilots have helped fill gaps by picking up additional shifts, he said, but they are limited to flying 100 hours a month under federal law.

Operations on the ground are also being affected. The Federal Aviation Administration warned on Thursday that rising infections among employees, including air traffic control staff, might result in delays.

The Transportation Security Administration said that it was concerned about rising virus infections, too, but that it had adequate staffing. Average wait times in airport security lines were about five minutes in recent days, a spokesman said.

Getting through security, of course, is no guarantee that the rest of the trip will be smooth.

Elizabeth Barnhisel and her husband were heading off on a delayed honeymoon when a canceled connection forced an unexpected overnight layover on Tuesday at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. Entering a baggage claim area, they found what looked like hundreds of bags lined up and crowds of miserable people -- some crying, some napping, because they had been waiting so long for their bags.

Every few hours, someone would offer a different reason for the fiasco: frozen carousels, Omicron, weather. After about 10 hours, Ms. Barnhisel's bag arrived from across the airport.

The couple eventually made it to their destination, Vancouver, but it was not the honeymoon experience Ms. Barnhisel had counted on. ''We're flabbergasted,'' she said. ''We definitely took a risk by taking this trip. But at the end of the day, we've got to get back to normal somehow.''

Cases have more than doubled over two weeks, and some counties have expended all their tests.

As the Omicron variant of the coronavirus continues to fuel a nationwide surge, North Carolina is seeing a drastic increase in Covid-19 cases. The state has reported a 166 percent increase in infections in two weeks, according to a New York Times database, and some counties are struggling to keep up with testing demands.

The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services reported that there were 19,174 new Covid-19 cases on Friday — a record high for the second straight day.

On Thursday, the department said in a statement that it was the “highest one-day number of Covid-19 cases” with 18,571, which was 60 percent higher than the previous daily record of 11,581 set in January 2021 after a holiday surge. The current jump in infections is most likely driven by the highly transmittable Omicron variant, according to local reports.

True case numbers are likely to be even higher, though, since at-home tests are not reported by the state.

The department also said that hospitalizations in the state had nearly doubled since the beginning of December. The number of people visiting emergency rooms for “Covid-like illness” on Thursday also set a record with 4,171 visits. The department added that 89 percent of people in intensive care for Covid-19 in the state were unvaccinated.

According to a New York Times database, intensive care units in North Carolina are 82 percent full. The average I.C.U. occupancy rate nationwide is 79 percent. Currently, only 57 percent of the state is fully vaccinated, trailing the national average, which is 62 percent.

On Thursday, the Wayne County Health Department announced that it had run out of coronavirus tests and would have no tests available “until further notice.”

“Demand for testing has increased significantly nationwide over the past two weeks, and additional test kits have been ordered from the state,” the department said. So far, the county has had the slowest rise in cases in the state.

In New Hanover County, a testing drive thru on Thursday had to end early because the location ran out of tests, according to a statement from the county.

Wake County, where the daily case count seems to be the highest in the state, announced on Saturday that although its testing sites would be open, there were no available appointments until Monday. The county had doubled its Covid-19 testing appointments to 13,000 daily slots last week “to help meet rapidly increasing community needs,” according to a statement. But the increase failed to meet demand.

Universities in the state are also taking more precautions. Duke University will have remote instruction until Jan. 18, the university announced on Friday. Residence halls will open as planned on Sunday, but the university is asking students to delay their return until instruction resumes as normal.

The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill is recommending that students and professors get booster shots when eligible and said it would announce any changes to on-campus operations by Monday.

For nearly two years, American officials have changed recommendations on how to manage the coronavirus. On Monday we got one of the biggest shifts yet: Infected people, who had long been told to isolate for at least 10 days, now have to isolate for only five days if they feel fine, regardless of vaccination status. On one level, this decision by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention is a welcome nod to science and practicality because many people aren't infectious for such a long period.

But the change doesn't grapple effectively with the reality that the fully vaccinated and boostered and the unvaccinated are living in two different worlds. The C.D.C. guidelines still rely on a mostly one-size-fits-all approach and ignore the use of antigen testing to make distinctions between the relative safety and danger of both groups.

When the pandemic began, there were no vaccines, so we all lived in a world where everyone was at the same high risk. The C.D.C. therefore recommended that people who became infected shelter in place for 10 days because evidence pointed to the fact that they could be infectious for quite some time. The C.D.C. also argued that those who were credibly exposed but not yet sick quarantine for 14 days, because it could take that long for them to become infected and infectious.

When vaccinations became widespread, however, the calculus changed. Those who were immunized were less likely to become infected and less likely to be as infectious. Because of this, the C.D.C. said this year that immunized people did not need to quarantine if exposed so long as they remained asymptomatic, although it recommended such people test a few days after exposure to be sure they were safe.

New recommendations go even further. They say that as long as people who test positive for the coronavirus are asymptomatic, they need isolate for only five days -- regardless of whether they are vaccinated, boostered or unvaccinated.

The recommendations also changed for quarantine, which is what uninfected people do if they are exposed. If they are boostered appropriately, they need be careful only for the next 10 days (i.e., wear a mask when around others). If they are unvaccinated or in need of a booster, they now need quarantine only for five days if they never become symptomatic and then be careful the next five. The recommendations also say that if for such people -- even if unvaccinated -- a quarantine ''is not feasible,'' they can just mask for 10 days. (The C.D.C. also recommends, if possible, getting tested five days after the exposure, whether or not a person is vaccinated and boostered.)

These numbers are mostly averages -- sometimes best guesses -- as to how people respond when exposed or infected. They're also pretty much equally applied to the fully vaccinated and unvaccinated alike, as if those two populations were the same.

This is puzzling. Covid itself hasn't changed that much for those who are unvaccinated. If they get infected, there's no reason to believe they shouldn't still follow the original guidelines and isolate for 10 days. This is a very infectious disease, and they are at risk not only to themselves but also to those around them. Hospitals are still full of unvaccinated people, and nothing had led us to believe that the danger is gone for them.

However, vaccinated people, especially boostered people, are at very low risk for bad outcomes, less likely to get infected if exposed and less likely to be infectious for longer periods.

It seems that even at this late date, the C.D.C. is trying to appease everyone and therefore is pleasing no one.

What would be better is a more evidence-driven approach. Antigen testing provides us a means to see whether people remain infected, and perhaps infectious, over time. My 17-year-old son, who is boostered, felt congested last week. Being responsible, we tested him at home with an antigen test, and he was positive.

The next day, though, he felt fine. Same with the day after. We tested him again, and he was negative. We tested him one day later, and he was still negative.

Of course, all this was possible because we bought a bunch of antigen tests a few weeks ago in case that happened. There's a nationwide shortage of such tests, and they're priced out of reach for too many Americans.

Based on his two negative tests, I would argue that at this time, my son is no longer infectious. He's asymptomatic, he's boostered, and he has repeatedly tested negative on antigen tests. That's why his isolation should end, not because of a one-size-fits-all rule that treats all people and all infections the same.

If, however, he had tested positive for more than five days, even if he was feeling fine, he might still be infectious. How would we know? Many people may feel pressured by jobs or obligations to ignore symptoms and get back to work or life before it's safe. They may minimize lingering symptoms as five-day isolations become the norm. And the unvaccinated may never quarantine because it ''is not feasible'' for them to do so. All of these scenarios would be acceptable under the new C.D.C. guidelines, but they all potentially present a risk of spreading coronavirus infections.

Covid-19 is becoming endemic. We are even seeing more and more people who are boostered getting infected. We cannot keep asking people to isolate for mandatory periods in the hope that Covid will go away. We have to find ways for living with the coronavirus, in which we recognize that for many, it is a mild infection from which they quickly recover. For others, Covid is a serious illness for which precaution is warranted. The biggest difference between those groups is immunization.

The C.D.C. should develop further guidelines, right now, that allow for those who are vaccinated and boostered to leave isolation as soon as possible after they have gotten negative results repeatedly with antigen tests. The government should do everything possible to make such antigen tests freely and easily available. The Biden administration's efforts are necessary but not sufficient. They need to go much further and much faster.

Such guidelines would provide another incentive for people to be fully vaccinated. They also might get more people who are avoiding testing because they fear a mandatory lockdown to test, because the implications of a positive test aren't as severe.

They would also provide us a means to transition to a way of thinking that recognizes that Covid is here to stay and that we need to find a way to live with it. Our previous plans were based on an illness that could be controlled by testing, contact tracing, quarantine and isolation, along with vaccination.

Omicron may not be so controlled; it appears to be very, very possible to prevent serious illness and death with vaccination, but it may not be possible to prevent transient infections, even with masking. If that's the case, we need to redouble our focus on the former and accept the latter. Infectious people need to isolate as long as they are infectious, no longer and no less, and we need more accurate means to make those judgments.

Covid is changing right before our eyes. We need to adapt along with it.

The added demand for testing and the higher prevalence of breakthrough cases have created an “opportune moment” to exploit.

On Dec. 29, The Gateway Pundit, a far-right website that often spreads conspiracy theories, published an article falsely implying that the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention had withdrawn authorization of all P.C.R. tests for detecting Covid-19. The article collected 22,000 likes, comments and shares on Facebook and Twitter.

On TikTok and Instagram, videos of at-home Covid-19 tests displaying positive results after being soaked in drinking water and juice have gone viral in recent weeks, and were used to push the false narrative that coronavirus rapid tests don’t work. Some household liquids can make a test show a positive result, health experts say, but the tests remain accurate when used as directed. One TikTok video showing a home test that came out positive after being placed under running water was shared at least 140,000 times.

And on YouTube, a video titled “Rapid antigen tests debunked” was posted on Jan. 1 by the Canadian far-right website Rebel News. It generated over 40,000 views, and its comments section was a hotbed of misinformation. “The straight up purpose of this test is to keep the case #’s as high as possible to maintain fear &amp; incentive for more restrictions,” said one comment with more than 200 likes. “And of course Profit.”

Misinformation about Covid-19 tests has spiked across social media in recent weeks, researchers say, as coronavirus cases have surged again worldwide because of the highly infectious Omicron variant.

The burst of misinformation threatens to further stymie public efforts to keep the health crisis under control. Previous spikes in pandemic-related falsehoods focused on the vaccines, masks and the severity of the virus. The falsehoods help undermine best practices for controlling the spread of the coronavirus, health experts say, noting that misinformation remains a key factor in vaccine hesitancy.

The categories include falsehoods that P.C.R. tests don’t work; that the counts for flu and Covid-19 cases have been combined; that P.C.R. tests are vaccines in disguise; and that at-home rapid tests have a predetermined result or are unreliable because different liquids can turn them positive.

These themes jumped into the thousands of mentions in the last three months of 2021, compared with just a few dozen in the same time period in 2020, according to Zignal Labs, which tracks mentions on social media, on cable television and in print and online outlets.

The added demand for testing due to Omicron and the higher prevalence of breakthrough cases has given purveyors of misinformation an “opportune moment” to exploit, said Kolina Koltai, a researcher at the University of Washington who studies online conspiracy theories. The false narratives “support the whole idea of not trusting the infection numbers or trusting the death count,” she said.

The Gateway Pundit did not respond to a request for comment. TikTok pointed to its policies that prohibit misinformation that could cause harm to people’s physical health. YouTube said it was reviewing the videos shared by The New York Times in line with its Covid-19 misinformation policies on testing and diagnostics. Twitter said that it had applied a warning to The Gateway Pundit’s article in December for violating its coronavirus misinformation policy and that tweets containing false information about widely accepted testing methods would also violate its policy. But the company said it does not take action on personal anecdotes.

Facebook said it had worked with its fact-checking partners to label many of the posts with warnings that directed people toward fact checks of the false claims, and reduced their prominence on its users’ feeds.

“The challenges of the pandemic are constantly changing, and we’re consistently monitoring for emerging false claims on our platforms,” Aaron Simpson, a Facebook spokesman, said in an email.

No medical test is perfect, and legitimate questions about the accuracy of Covid-19 tests have abounded throughout the pandemic. There has always been a risk of a false positive or a false negative result. The Food and Drug Administration says there is a potential for antigen tests to return false positive results when users do not follow the instructions. Those tests are generally accurate when used correctly but in some cases can appear to show a positive result when exposed to other liquids, said Dr. Glenn Patriquin, who published a study about false positives in antigen tests using various liquids in a publication of the American Society for Microbiology.

“Using a fluid with a different chemical makeup than what was designed means that result lines might appear unpredictably,” said Dr. Patriquin, an assistant professor of pathology at Dalhousie University in Nova Scotia.

Complicating matters, there have been some defective products. Last year, the Australian company Ellume recalled about two million of the at-home testing products that it had shipped to the United States.

But when used correctly, coronavirus tests are considered reliable at detecting people carrying high levels of the virus. Experts say our evolving knowledge of tests should be a distinct issue from lies about testing that have spread widely on social media — though it does make debunking those lies more challenging.

“Science is inherently uncertain and changes, which makes tackling misinformation exceedingly difficult,” Ms. Koltai said.

Researchers say that the falsehoods are rising despite efforts by social media companies to crack down, and that many contain lies that had surfaced in the past.

The surge “fits with the misinformation industry’s pattern during the pandemic,” said John Gregory, deputy health editor at NewsGuard, which rates the credibility of news sites and has tracked the prevalence of Covid-19 and vaccine misinformation. “Whatever the current mainstream story is, they seek their own narrative to undermine it.”

The C.D.C. said in July that it would withdraw its request to the Food and Drug Administration for emergency-use authorization of one specific test at the end of the year. Hundreds of other Covid-19 tests are still available from other manufacturers, the C.D.C. later clarified.

Still, posts claiming that the agency had withdrawn support of P.C.R. tests went viral on Facebook. The most widely shared post pushing the falsehood in July collected 11,500 likes, shares and comments, according to data from CrowdTangle, a Facebook-owned social media analytics tool. The post added the falsehood that the C.D.C.’s advisory meant that P.C.R. tests could not distinguish between the coronavirus and the flu, when in fact the agency had simply recommended the use of tests that could simultaneously detect and distinguish between the flu and Covid-19.

Despite being fact-checked within days, the claim never fully went away. The Gateway Pundit article revived the claim at the end of the year, collecting nearly double the earlier post’s likes, shares and comments on Facebook. On Instagram, screenshots of the article also went viral, collecting hundreds of likes.

Mr. Gregory said a similar phenomenon had occurred with social media posts claiming various liquids turned at-home coronavirus tests positive.

On Dec. 23, 2020, a video on YouTube showed coronavirus tests turning positive after being tested on kiwi, orange and berry fruit juice. It collected over 102,000 views. In the same month, a video producing the same results with Coca-Cola was posted on YouTube, collecting 16,800 views.

One year later, a spate of similar videos with the same theme appeared on TikTok and Instagram.

For Ms. Koltai, the re-emergence of false narratives even after social media companies labeled them a year earlier shows the power of misinformation to “thrive when it can latch on to a current event.”

“That is how narratives can peak at different times,” she said.

Remember the coronavirus pandemic? Some shows, faced with an unpredictable reality, prefer to put it safely in the past.

''Sex and the City'' always existed in a fantasy version of New York City, but in its HBO Max sequel, ''And Just Like That,'' there's a different sort of illusion at work. In the opening scene, Carrie (Sarah Jessica Parker), Charlotte (Kristin Davis) and Miranda (Cynthia Nixon) are waiting for a table at a very crowded, very indoor restaurant.

''Remember when we legally had to stand six feet apart from one another?'' Carrie quips.

And just like that ... Covid is over. At least it is in this show's Manhattan, as well as in a cohort of other series that try, wishfully, to press the epidemiological fast-forward button.

In the real world, the Omicron variant may be driving case counts into the stratosphere, but on TV, the pandemic is playing dead. In the Season 11 premiere of ''Curb Your Enthusiasm,'' Larry David's HBO comedy of ill manners, chaos breaks out during a party (specifically, a premature funeral) at Albert Brooks's house when Larry finds a closet stuffed with Purell, toilet paper and KN95 masks, exposing the ''Lost in America'' director as having been a ''Covid hoarder.''

You know -- during the pandemic. The one that is definitely over.

For nearly two years now, representing (or avoiding) Covid on TV has been a choice among bad options. Most shows ignored it altogether. A few, like ''Social Distance'' on Netflix, made the pandemic a direct subject, earnestly if clunkily.

But maybe most awkward have been the series that acknowledged Covid existed but declared or implied it was over long before Covid decided it was over. NBC's time-skipping ''This Is Us'' played the pandemic's greatest hits throughout Season 5 -- quarantine, video calls, pandemic unemployment -- but this week's Season 6 premiere suggests that the show has moved on. Season 2 of HBO Max's ''Love Life,'' a story that spans several years, includes one pandemic episode, then begins the next in a version of 2021 where an audience is sitting unmasked in New York's La MaMa theater.

Some prime-time series about doctors, police and other emergency workers made fitful efforts to depict Covid, but their mask discipline sagged over time. ''Grey's Anatomy,'' for instance, brought the pandemic full-on to Seattle Grace hospital in fall 2020. By fall 2021, it opened with the disclaimer that it now ''portrays a fictional, post-pandemic world which represents our hopes for the future.''

These are all understandable choices, and maybe the only creatively practical ones. But they make for some potent cognitive dissonance. When I watched a ''post-pandemic'' ''Grey's'' episode recently on Hulu, it opened with a pre-roll ad urging me to get a booster shot.

For programs that simply try to show how people live daily life, the pandemic's challenges are both subtler and more pervasive than those presented by past catastrophes. After 9/11, there was no need for homeland-security alerts to impinge on ''Friends,'' and the subsequent fixation on terrorism was even a natural driver of plot for action thrillers.

The pandemic, on the other hand, quelled action. Covid touched every aspect of mundane life. Masks limited facial expression. Real-life distancing practices meant that the basic engine of sitcoms -- people in a room or a bar or an office, talking -- was now fraught with angst.

Very occasionally, series have managed to capture this reality, as in the second and final season of HBO's naturalistic comedy ''Betty,'' whose young characters skateboarded through pandemic-era New York in various states of matter-of-fact maskedness.

The remake of ''Scenes From a Marriage'' split the difference oddly, opening with the fourth-wall-breaking image of the cast and crew working under Covid protocols, then letting its domestic dissolution play out sans masks.

More often, TV has breezed past the situation, or wished it away. As long as a year ago, series were declaring early victory over Covid. NBC's ''Mr. Mayor,'' which premiered last January, starred Ted Danson as the mayor of Los Angeles, a job in which managing public health is not a small detail. The pilot yada-yadas the pandemic away by having him mention that ''Dolly Parton bought everyone the vaccine.'' (A later episode does involve a lice outbreak.)

To its credit, a series like ''And Just Like That'' is at least trying to acknowledge the pandemic, rather than shunt it offscreen. It just does so in the past tense.

The Peloton on which Mr. Big (Chris Noth) takes his fateful last ride was a habit many other shut-ins of a certain income acquired during lockdown, which was also when he and Carrie began their evening ritual of listening to vinyl LPs. Anthony (Mario Cantone) runs a bakery, the offshoot of one more Covid-acquired sourdough hobby. And when Carrie calls Miranda out for her drinking in a recent episode, Miranda shoots back: ''I am drinking too much. Yes. We all were in the pandemic, and I guess I just kept going.'' Make mine a double.

There's a note of wistful, wishful thinking in all this retconning of reality -- would that we could write a time jump into our own scripts! But there's also the simple matter of timing. TV generally works on a faster schedule than movies or books, but it's not instantaneous (and shooting during Covid tends to take longer).

So TV creators -- suddenly conscripted, like educators and restaurant managers, into making public-health decisions they never expected to be part of the job description -- have been left to guess at Covid's future like a hapless pop culture C.D.C.

In some cases, what's onscreen now is a time capsule from the heady early days of vaccine optimism. The post-Covid ''Curb'' season wrapped production a few mutations ago, in May, when the virus seemed to be fizzling into oblivion. (The executive producer Jeff Schaffer told The Hollywood Reporter that the season takes place ''Right now, if everyone had the brains to get vaccinated.'') A ''comfy chic'' challenge in the newest ''Project Runway'' season, produced in spring, had contestants adapt ''those awful couch clothes that we've all been living in for over a year,'' presumably for a post-Covid future.

''South Park,'' which released a two-movie ''Post Covid'' special on Paramount+ in November and December, has one of the quickest turnaround times in TV -- the first installment was released just as Omicron was discovered and the second worked in a reference to the variant. But it put the ''post'' in its ''Post Covid'' premise by using time travel and alternate reality to depict a future in which humanity had -- well, almost -- beaten the virus. (Maybe the most far-fetched twist is its resolution, in which, with the series's frustrating both-sidesing, vaxxers and antivaxxers shower each other with apologies for getting so worked up during the plague years.)

Still, it's striking that TV, whose strength is the ability to stay on top of the moment, has generally worked so hard to avoid the biggest thing to happen to its collective audience in the past two years. You could easily imagine face masks becoming a staple, even a cliché, of period dramas some day -- a visual shorthand for ''the turbulent days of 2020'' the way a shot of the corner of Haight and Ashbury says ''the '60s'' -- even as future rerun-watchers puzzle at why they're nowhere to be found in the TV of our own time.

Maybe it's only fitting that TV producers should muddle through this garbage storm like everyone else, unsure what the rules will be by airtime, wishing they knew where the pandemic fell on the spectrum between temporary emergency and permanent way of life. And I'm sure plenty of viewers would rather be reminded of anything else.

But you're reminded anyway, if only by the twinge of uncanniness from seeing TV characters act as if the pandemic were history, even as you're still trying to get your hands on rapid antigen tests. I bet Albert Brooks has a ton of them.

C.D.C. researchers are watching for signs that Omicron may affect the youngest children in unforeseen ways, but other factors may explain the rise.

The number of hospitalized young children infected with the coronavirus rose precipitously last week to the highest levels since the beginning of the pandemic, according to data released on Friday by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

The increase was observed in children who were 4 and younger, who are not eligible for vaccination, and the data included children who were admitted to hospitals for reasons other than Covid.

The rise may be partly explained by the surge of Omicron cases, which affects all populations, and the spread of other respiratory infections.

But the data do not show a similar steep rise in coronavirus infections among hospitalized children of other ages, and federal health officials were considering the possibility that Omicron may not be as mild in young children as it is older children.

Children infected with the variant are still at much less risk of becoming severely ill compared with adults, and even young children seem less likely to need ventilators than those admitted during previous surges, doctors said.

''We have not yet seen a signal that there is any increased severity in this age demographic,'' Dr. Rochelle Walensky, the C.D.C.'s director, told reporters at a news briefing on Friday.

More than four in 100,000 children ages 4 and younger admitted to hospitals were infected with the coronavirus as of Jan. 1 -- double the rate reported a month ago and about three times the rate this time last year.

By contrast, the rate of hospitalized 5- to 11-year-olds with Covid was 0.6 per 100,000, roughly the same figure reported over past many months.

Dr. Walensky noted that only 16 percent of children from 5 to 11 had been fully vaccinated, and she urged everyone who was eligible for vaccines and boosters to receive them as soon as possible.

''Sadly, we are seeing the rates of hospitalizations increasing for children 0 to 4, who are not yet currently eligible for Covid-19 vaccination,'' she said. ''It's critically important that we surround them with people who are vaccinated to provide them protection.''

The rise has been noticeable at a number of regional medical centers. The hospitalizations of young children now are ''blowing away our previous Delta wave at the end of the summer, early fall, which had been our highest prior to that,'' said Dr. Danielle Zerr, a pediatric infectious diseases expert at Seattle Children's Hospital.

Experts are typically cautious about interpreting an increase in pediatric hospitalizations as a sign that a variant is particularly severe in children relative to adults. There were similar fears about the Delta and Beta variants, but the rise in pediatric hospitalizations then turned out to be more a consequence of the contagiousness of the variants.

This time, too, at least part of the increase in cases is a reflection of Omicron's surge across all age groups. The nation is now recording roughly 600,000 cases on average per day, about one in five of them in children.

''The more kids that get infected, the more you're going to have kids who are going to be sick enough to be hospitalized,'' said Dr. Yvonne Maldonado, chair of the committee on infectious diseases at the American Academy of Pediatrics and a physician at Stanford University.

At Seattle Children's Hospital, for example, about 21 percent of children are testing positive for the coronavirus, compared with the average of about 1 percent and a high during the Delta wave of about 3 percent.

''That is just a game changer,'' Dr. Zerr said of the more recent figures.

Doctors may be quicker to admit a young child than an adult with similar symptoms, and that may account for some of the rising rates in young children. But some experts said the increase this time might be too steep to be explained only by the usual factors.

One alternative hypothesis for the rise may be that young children are particularly vulnerable to infections in the upper airway -- exactly where Omicron is thought to be more concentrated in comparison with other variants.

''They're smaller, their airways are smaller,'' Dr. Kristin Oliver, a pediatrician at Mount Sinai Hospital in New York, said of young children.

''It does seem reasonable in a disease that if it looks like it's affecting the upper airway more, that they would be more impacted,'' she added. ''They are more at risk for that -- for longer, prolonged cases, as well as the hospitalization that can come along with a more severe case.''

That may explain why more hospitalized children aged 4 and younger have tested positive for the coronavirus throughout the pandemic than those 5 and older. It's also why young children are more vulnerable to other pathogens, like respiratory syncytial virus, and to having the seal-like cough associated with croup.

For parents of young children, the numbers add another layer of worry as they wait for vaccines to become available.

Alicia Henriquez, a public-school teacher in Chicago, has three children, two of them younger than 5. Her younger children -- Maxi, 4 and Sofia, 2 -- are both infected with the coronavirus, but Maxi has no symptoms at all, and Sofia has only a cough.

Still, Ms. Henriquez said she was monitoring their symptoms carefully. ''You don't know if your child is going to end up in the hospital or not, so I think you still have to be careful,'' she said.

The C.D.C.'s new data were collected by Covid-Net, the agency's hospitalization surveillance network, which includes 14 sites and covers about 10 percent of the U.S. population. The rates are likely to be underestimates because of the lack of availability of tests, according to the agency.

Many children who become severely ill have other conditions or have weak immune systems. ''Those kids are definitely at high risk right now,'' Dr. Maldonado said. ''We're seeing more of them now than we were before.''

Dr. Julie Binder, a gastroenterologist in Philadelphia, has two daughters under 5. Her older daughter, Annie, 4, has an undiagnosed medical condition that results in ''some very bizarre reactions'' to viruses, Dr. Binder said. After a viral infection landed Annie in the hospital two years ago, she had complications for months.

Dr. Binder and her husband have been adamant about maintaining as normal a life for Annie as possible, even during the pandemic. But they have kept her home from day care the past couple of weeks to shield her from the post-holiday spike in infections.

''Hearing this information, I'm certainly glad that I did,'' Dr. Binder said of the data released on Friday. ''I would have felt much more comfortable through this wave right now if she had been vaccinated.''

A coronavirus vaccine is not yet available in the United States to children under 5, and is unlikely to be for a few more months. But many older children are also still unvaccinated.

Fewer than 25 percent of children from 5 to 11, and just over 60 percent of adolescents from 12 to 17, have received at least one dose of a coronavirus vaccine.

''If you're really worried about your child getting sick, you should be vaccinating your child,'' Dr. Maldonado said. ''It's the easiest thing we can do right now to keep our kids healthy.''

As of Oct. 31, about one in three children hospitalized with Covid was obese. Still, about half had no other known medical conditions, according to data collected by the C.D.C.

It took more than a year for the world to record the first 100 million coronavirus cases, and half that time to tally the next 100 million.

The third 100 million came even faster, in barely five months, as large segments of countries, rich and poor alike, remain unvaccinated and a fast-spreading new variant has proved able to infect even those who are.

Case counts, though imperfect, have been a key barometer throughout the pandemic, a benchmark not only for governments implementing mitigation measures but also for people trying to discern the threat in their own communities. Yet surpassing 300 million known cases -- a milestone that was reached on Thursday, according to the Center for Systems Science and Engineering at Johns Hopkins University -- comes as a growing number of experts argue that it is time to stop focusing on case numbers.

So far, the new Omicron variant appears to produce severe illness in fewer people than previous versions of the virus did, and research indicates that Covid vaccines still offer protection against the worst outcomes. And though cases are rising faster than ever -- the United States, Australia, France and many other nations are seeing record surges -- hospitalizations and deaths from Covid are increasing more slowly.

But experts do worry that the sheer number of possible cases may still burden health care systems already strained by previous waves of infection.

This week, Dr. Anthony S. Fauci, the U.S. government's top infectious disease expert, suggested that it was time to stop focusing on case counts.

''As you get further on and the infections become less severe, it is much more relevant to focus on the hospitalizations,'' Dr. Fauci told ABC News on Sunday.

About 60 percent of the world has received at least a single dose of a Covid vaccine, but nearly three-quarters of all the shots have been administered in the world's wealthiest nations, leaving people in parts of Africa and Asia vulnerable.

In the United States, cases are averaging a staggering 610,000 each day, a 227 percent increase from two weeks ago. Hospitalizations are rising at a slower rate, up 60 percent in the past two weeks, while deaths are up by 2 percent. In France, average daily cases have quadrupled to a record, while hospitalizations have risen by about 70 percent and deaths have doubled, according to the Our World in Data project at the University of Oxford.

The trend suggests that the grim cadence seen for the past two years -- a wave of infections, followed by a matching surge of hospitalizations, then deaths -- may have been altered, in large part because of the protection offered by vaccines. However, because of the way deaths lag cases, it will be weeks before the full effect of the current case surge is reflected in death counts.

And because of the widening availability of at-home tests in the United States and Europe, official case numbers -- which scientists have long argued are an undercount -- may diverge more than ever from actual totals. Not all home tests are reported to authorities and many people may never get tested. Even before Omicron emerged, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention estimated that only one in four U.S. infections was reported.

Case numbers ''definitely mean less than they did'' earlier in the pandemic, said Robert West, a professor of health psychology at University College London. ''If we had this number of infections then, we'd have had an astronomical number of deaths.''

Still, the known death toll remains devastating: more than 830,000 in the United States, 620,000 in Brazil, nearly half a million in India. In many developing nations with huge gaps in health data, the true number may never be known.

And Omicron's impact could be harsher among populations with less protection from vaccines. Some of the fastest increases in cases are occurring in African countries, which have the lowest vaccination rates. Less than a handful of the countries on the continent are on track to meet a World Health Organization goal of administering two doses to 70 percent of their populations, even as rich nations have offered a third.

''Booster after booster in a small number of countries will not end a pandemic while billions remain completely unprotected,'' the W.H.O. director general, Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, said on Thursday.

What is clear, many experts say, is that the virus is likely to become endemic, something that the world will have to live with for years to come, like the flu -- and that by the time the world records case 400 million, as it surely will, that statistic will mean even less than it does now.

''I think when we had the first wave, a lot of people felt -- not experts, but the public and many politicians felt -- that if we could only weather the storm, we could come out the other side in the summer of 2020 and everything would be rosy,'' Professor West said. ''We know now that is never going to be true.''

In a striking critique, six prominent health experts who advised President Biden's transition team called for an entirely new domestic coronavirus strategy.

WASHINGTON -- On the day President Biden was inaugurated, the advisory board of health experts who counseled him during his transition officially ceased to exist. But its members have quietly continued to meet regularly over Zoom, their conversations often turning to frustration with Mr. Biden's coronavirus response.

Now, six of these former advisers have gone public with an extraordinary, albeit polite, critique -- and a plea to be heard. In three opinion articles published on Thursday in The Journal of the American Medical Association, they called for Mr. Biden to adopt an entirely new domestic pandemic strategy geared to the ''new normal'' of living with the virus indefinitely, not to wiping it out.

The authors are all big names in American medicine. Several, including Dr. Luciana Borio, a former acting chief scientist at the Food and Drug Administration, and Dr. David Michaels, a former head of the Occupational Safety and Health Administration now with George Washington University's School of Public Health, have held high-ranking government positions. Dr. Ezekiel Emanuel, an oncologist, medical ethicist and University of Pennsylvania professor who advised former President Barack Obama, organized the effort.

Like any White House, Mr. Biden's prizes loyalty and prefers to keep its differences in house; in that regard, the articles are an unusual step. The authors say they wrote them partly because they have not made headway talking directly to White House officials.

''From a macroperspective, it feels like we are always fighting yesterday's crisis and not necessarily thinking what needs to be done today to prepare us for what comes next,'' Dr. Borio said.

The authors shared the articles with White House officials before they were published, but it was unclear whether the administration would adopt any of their suggestions. Dr. Anthony S. Fauci, Mr. Biden's top medical adviser for the pandemic, declined to comment on the articles.

The White House press secretary, Jen Psaki, told reporters she had not read the articles, and dismissed a question about whether the president ''is coming around to accepting'' that Covid-19 is here to stay, even though several recent media accounts suggested that the administration was beginning to operate under that assumption. Mr. Biden's recent emphasis on keeping schools open and businesses running even when cases are soaring also suggests a recalibration, as does a recent decision by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to recommend that people with Covid isolate for five days instead of 10.

''The president's goal is to defeat the virus,'' Ms. Psaki said, adding, ''The president's focus and objective now is to save as many lives as possible.''

Outlining their ideas for the ''new normal'' strategy, Dr. Emanuel and two co-authors -- Michael T. Osterholm, an epidemiologist at the University of Minnesota, and Dr. Celine Gounder, an infectious disease expert at New York University -- pointedly noted that in July, Mr. Biden proclaimed that ''we've gained the upper hand against this virus,'' which in retrospect was clearly not the case.

Now, with the Omicron variant fueling an enormous new surge, they wrote, the United States must avoid becoming stuck in ''a perpetual state of emergency.'' The first step, they wrote, is recognizing that the coronavirus is one of several respiratory viruses circulating, and developing policies to address all of them together.

To be better prepared for inevitable outbreaks -- including from new coronavirus variants -- they suggested that the administration lay out goals and specific benchmarks, including what number of hospitalizations and deaths from respiratory viruses, including influenza and Covid-19, should prompt emergency mitigation and other measures.

In addition to urging the administration to adopt a longer view, the authors took pointed issue with some of Mr. Biden's current policies and stances -- especially on political lightning rod issues. They called for more aggressive use of vaccine mandates, which have drawn fierce opposition from Republicans, and said the nation needed a digital verification system for vaccination -- so-called vaccine passports -- which Mr. Biden has resisted in the face of Republican attacks on the concept.

''Relying on forgeable paper cards is unacceptable in the 21st century,'' wrote Dr. Borio, Dr. Emanuel and Dr. Rick Bright, the chief executive of the Rockefeller Foundation's Pandemic Prevention Institute.

The most surprising thing about the articles is that they were written at all. Several of the authors said in interviews they were dismayed that the administration seemed caught off guard by the Delta and Omicron variants. Dr. Bright, who helped write two of the pieces, recalled the warning he issued when the advisory board had its last meeting on Jan. 20, 2021.

''The last thing I said,'' he recalled, ''is that our vaccines are going to get weaker and eventually fail. We must now prepare for variants; we have to put a plan in place to continually update our vaccines, our diagnostics and our genomics so we can catch this early. Because the variants will come, and we should never be surprised and we should never underestimate this virus.''

Mr. Biden published a pandemic strategy when he came into office, and Dr. Emanuel said the administration ''executed very well on it through June,'' until the Delta variant brought a new surge of cases. The president recently released a new winter strategy, just as the Omicron variant began spreading in the United States.

Many of the steps the authors suggest -- including faster development of vaccines and therapeutics; ''comprehensive, digital, real-time'' data collection by the C.D.C.; and a corps of ''community public health workers'' -- are already part of Mr. Biden's plans.

He has taken steps to control the spread of Omicron and to ensure that hospital systems do not get overwhelmed. He has sent military troops to states including Wisconsin and Indiana to help out at hospitals, and has opened new testing sites in New York and elsewhere. He has insisted there will be no lockdowns, and has repeatedly pleaded with Americans to get vaccinated.

''I honest to God believe it's your patriotic duty,'' Mr. Biden said recently.

But Dr. Bright said such language was turning off Americans, including many Trump voters, who are resistant to vaccines.

''The message continues to berate unvaccinated people and almost bully unvaccinated people,'' said Dr. Bright, who led a federal biomedical agency during the Trump administration but quit the government after being demoted for complaining about political interference in science. ''There are so many reasons people are unvaccinated; it's not just because they follow Trump.''

The authors say the administration needs to look past Omicron and acknowledge that it may not mark the end of the pandemic -- and to plan for a future that they concede is unknowable. They also make clear that the current rate of Covid hospitalizations and deaths, an average of more than 1,300 lives lost each day in the United States, is unacceptably high.

In the three articles -- one proposing a new national plan, the others suggesting improvements to testing, surveillance, vaccines and therapeutics -- the authors also make more specific suggestions.

They call for next-generation Covid vaccines that would target new variants or perhaps take new forms, like nasal sprays or skin patches, that would be easier to distribute; for a ''universal coronavirus vaccine'' that would combat all known coronaviruses; and for major upgrades to public health infrastructure. And while they said the president's pledge to buy 500 million rapid coronavirus tests and distribute them free was ''an important step,'' they wrote that ''many more are needed.''

The authors also said that vaccine mandates should be imposed more broadly, including for schoolchildren, and that N95 masks should be made free and readily available to all Americans, as should oral treatments for Covid. (Mr. Biden has imposed several vaccine mandates on workers, but they are tied up in court.)

Dr. Gounder said she had been disappointed by the administration's ''single-minded focus on vaccines'' and with its decreasing emphasis on mask-wearing. Dr. Borio said she had been ''very frustrated'' that there was no federal system linking testing to treatments, so that people who tested positive and were at high risk for Covid complications could get prescriptions on the spot for new antiviral medicines.

Dr. Emanuel -- brother to Rahm Emanuel, Mr. Obama's first chief of staff and Mr. Biden's ambassador to Japan -- echoed that sentiment. If the distribution of new therapies is left to ''the usual health care system,'' he said, only ''rich, well-connected people'' would have access.

The articles reflect both their frustrations and their desire to help, the authors said. They recognize that they have the luxury of taking a 30,000-foot view while administration experts are slogging it out in the trenches.

''But at the same time,'' Dr. Bright said, ''we think a lot of work still needs to be done.''

